Youth Ministry Great Games Ice Breaker Questions
Sometimes you just need silly questions to ask people! Here’s a running list! To submit more, email Ben Richter!

•What’s your favorite kitchen utensil?
•If the world were full of clones of you, what would that world be like?
•If you could have any superpower, what would it be?
•When was the last time you did something for the first time?  What was it?
•If you could be one for just 24 hours, what cereal box cartoon character would you be? Why?
•What is your favorite animal? List three adjectives to explain your choice.
•What is your favorite color? List three adjectives to explain your choice.
•What was the best thing that happened to you this weekend?
•If you were to perform in the circus, what would be your act?
•What do you consider the most valuable thing you own?
•What's the kindest act you have ever seen done (either to/by you or another)?
•If you could have any job in the world, real or imagined, what would you want?
•What are your best/worst subjects in school?
•If you could eliminate one thing you do each day in the bathroom so that you never had to do it again, what would it be?
•If you were just given a yacht, what would you name it?
•Name your favorite song.
•If you were to get a tattoo, what would it say or what would the graphic be?
•If you could play any musical instrument, what would it be and why? If you already play an instrument(s), what do you play and why?
•When trick-or-treating as a kid, was there any kind of candy that you didn't like to get?
•What is your favorite memory of Christmases past?
•What is the most outrageous thing you've done for God?
•If a movie was being made of your life and you could choose the actor/actress to play you, who would you choose and why?
•Paper or plastic?
•What is the weirdest food you've ever eaten?
•What do you keep in the trunk of your car?
•When you were in grade school, what did you want to be when you grew up? Why?
•If you owned a CB radio what would your "handle" be?
•If you were given 24 hours to live, what would you do?
•If you were in the "Miss America" talent competition, what would your talent be? (Note: both guys & gals have to answer this question)
•What do you think the most ultimate gift of the world is?
•Tell something that nobody knows about you.
•What is your earliest childhood memory?
•What was your favorite TV show when you were growing up?
•If you had one extra hour of free time a day, how would you use it?
•What’s your favorite song at the current moment? What’s in your favorite playlist?
•Name the most famous person you've had a face-to-face encounter with ("brush with greatness").
•Name your favorite children's story.
•Name your favorite Bible story.
•If you could spend 15 minutes with any person, living or not, who would it be and why?
•What person in the Bible do you most closely identify with?
•What article of clothing most closely describes your personality?
•If you were to write a book what would it be about?
•What is the first thing you think of when you wake up in the morning?
•If you won a million dollars, what would you do with it?
•Who is/was your favorite teacher and why?
•What makes you feel the most secure?
•Who do you admire the most?
•What was your nickname growing up or now?
•What is your favorite cartoon character & why?
•Who inspires you and how are you a bit like them?
•Based on something you've already done, how might you make it into the Guinness Book of World Records?
•If you knew you could not fail, what would you do?
•What was your favorite thing to play with as a child? Or what was your favorite childhood game. Why?
•If you could be any animal in the world for 24 hours, which animal would you be? Why?
•If you could rid the world of one thing, what would it be?
•What is your best personal characteristic?
•If you could be invisible for a day, what would you do?
•What is your favorite weird food combination?
•If you had to be a flower, which one would you like to be and why?
•My biggest pet peeve is...
•What is your favorite commercial? What commercial annoys you the most?
•If you had to be a teacher of something, what would you teach?
•How would you like to be remembered?
•What is one thing that you constantly think about (other than material things)?
•What's your favorite sport?
•What's your middle name?  Why?
•What kind of music do you like?
•What is your favorite animal?
•What do you keep in your wallet or purse aside from money, cards and pictures?
•What punctuation mark best describes your personality? Why?
•If you could plan your ultimate vacation, where would you go?
•What is something you have that is of sentimental value?
•What is your most embarrassing moment?
•What do you miss most about childhood?
•What one thing (modern convenience) could you not live without?
•If you could meet anyone from history, who would you meet and why?
•What was the first live concert you ever attended?
•If you could meet anyone from the Bible who would it be and what would you ask them? (Besides Jesus)
•What specific thing have you done that impressed yourself? What was your most epic moment?
•What's your passion?
•What does your room look like?
•What website do you surf to the most?
•If you could only wear one color for the rest of your life, what would it be and why?
•If you could have one super human power, what would it be?
•What is the weirdest gift you have ever received?
•What is your favorite season?
•What's the best dinner you ever had?
•Who has been the biggest inspiration in your life? Why?
•If you were attending a Halloween party, what would your costume be and why?
•If you could go back in time, where/when would you go?
•If you had unlimited money and space, what one thing would you add to your bedroom?
•If you could go only to one restaurant for the next five years, which would it be?
•What is something you have lost that you have never found, or were tremendously relieved when you did find it?
•What is your favorite breakfast?
•What do you wake up to? A CD, the radio, a buzzer, etc.?
•What is set as the background on your computer?
•Where would you like to be a missionary to?
•List 10 items everyone in the group has in common.
•If your house were burning down, what would you take and why?
•Describe your favorite pair of PJ's
•What is your very favorite part of your day?
•What is your best scar? Tell the story of how you got it.
•You win a million dollars, but you have to give half to a charity. Which charity do you pick, and what do you do with the rest of the money?
•What household chore do you hate the most?
•If you had a "theme song" that played whenever you walk into a room full of people, what would it be?
•Describe your past week as a type of landscape or a weather forecast.
•When you were in elementary school, what was your favorite activity at recess?
•If you were on the cover of a magazine, which one would it be and why?
•What kind of toothpaste do you use?
•What is your favorite holiday?
•If you could drive/ride/or fly anything to school, what would it be? Why?
•What is your favorite candy? Explain.
•What scares you the most?
•If you were a tree, what kind of tree would you be and why?
•Which animal represents you the best and why?
•What is your favorite way to express yourself and why?
•If you were a piece of furniture what would you be?  Why?
•How many siblings do you have? Are you the oldest, a middle child, or youngest?
•What are your favorite pizza toppings?
•If you could ask God a question what would it be?
•What's the worst trouble you got into when you were young? What did you do?
•What’s more important to you…the ride or the destination?
•What's your favorite ice cream flavor?
•What are your three favorite smells?
•What is your favorite time of day?
•What would you do if you really liked someone and after a while of hanging out you discovered that they did not believe in God?
•What was the first CD or song on iTunes that you bought?
•What is your favorite winter activity?
•If you had to be handcuffed to one person for an entire month, who would it be?
•What is your favorite song to sing in the shower?
•If you could take back something hurtful you've once said to someone, what would it be?
•What's the oldest piece of clothing you still own and wear?
•What do you look for in a friend?
•What's the most important thing to you in life?
•What type of music relaxes you the most?
•What is the best gift anyone's ever given you?
•What TV game show would you want to go on?
•What famous line did your parents use over and over?
•If you auditioned for American Idol, what song would you sing?
•If you could instantly become fluent in another language, what would that language be and why?
•What is your favorite Disney song?
•I still can't believe I once __________
•One particular day/night that I wanted to last forever was...
•What was the best concert you went to (who and when)?
•If you had your own talk show, who would your first three guests be?
•What's the best sound effect you can make? Do it.
•What do you miss most about being a kid?
•What is your favorite tradition? (family tradition, church tradition, whatever)
•Tell about the last time you had to ask for help.
•What CD or song would your friends be surprised that you own?
•Did you or do you currently have a collection of some kind as a child? If so, what was it?
•If you could mix three animals together, which ones would you choose to make the ultimate animal?
•You have to wear a t-shirt with one word on it for the rest of your life. Which word do you choose?
•If you were a shoe, what kind would you be and why?
•If you can thank God for one thing in your life, what would it be?
•If you were to be a natural element, which would you rather be: earth, wind, fire, or water? (Bonus points for heart)
•Would you ever loan a significant amount of money to a friend/relative? Why or why not?
•If you won a pet monkey, what trick would you teach it to do for you?
•If you could invent a gadget what would it do? What features would it have?
•If you could live with a TV family, which one would you live with? Why?
•If you were to compete in a triathlon, what three events would you win?
•Ideal last meal?
Skip to main content
Teen Vogue
Newsletter
Search
STYLE
POLITICS
CULTURE
IDENTITY
VIDEO
SUMMIT
SHOPPING
Identity
201 Actually Interesting Questions to Get to Know Someone
Get ready for some silly topics.
By Erika Owen and Liv McConnell
September 4, 2025
Tween girls hanging out together in bohemian style home
Getty Images / Klaus Vedfelt
Find all of Teen Vogue's questions stories here.

Asking the right questions to get to know someone is harder than it sounds. Whether it’s a new classmate, a friend of a friend, someone you’re crushing on, or your best friend’s sibling, it’s always nice to have a vault of “get to know you” questions on hand.

Are you capable of surviving conversational lulls without them? We promise you that you are, and we could all stand to get comfier with “awkward” silence anyway. But we also don’t blame you if meeting someone for the first time — say, while on a first date with them — isn’t when you want to start suddenly embracing silence. (Our social anxiety flares up at the thought, honestly!)

There’s nothing wrong with keeping on file some backup questions to ask someone you just met. Even if the conversation is going well already, asking thoughtful questions is a great way to show real interest and more meaningfully connect. That goes for close friends and significant others, too. Whether it’s your best friend since grade school or your longtime girlfriend, getting older and gaining life experiences means our perspective and opinions are always evolving. To keep close, authentic relationships, questions to ask to get to know someone are always a good idea — because we should never assume we already know all there is to know about a person!

Trending Now

 


All this talk about talking put you in the mood to gab? We’ll share some pointers for skipping small talk and asking good “get to know you” questions below, from body language cues to tips for keeping the convo flowing freely. Then, we’ll break down our favorite questions to ask by vibe — from deep talks to fun banter — and how long you’ve known the person, whether you’re chatting for the first time or looking for questions to get to know someone better who’s already in your life. Regardless of the vibe or audience, though, we’ve made sure these are all genuinely interesting topics to discuss. No “so, what do you think of this weather?” talk to be found here!

In this article:

How to Ask Good “Get to Know You” Questions
Questions to Ask Someone You Just Met
Personal Questions to Get to Know Someone Better
Deep Questions to Ask Someone (New or Old)
Fun “Get to Know You” Questions
Funny Questions to Ask Just For Laughs
How to Ask Good “Get to Know You” Questions
When asking questions to get to know someone, you don’t want it to feel like a formal interview. So, skip the rapid-fire checklist and start with curiosity, asking open-ended questions that can’t be answered with just “yes” or “no.” (“What’s your dream vacation?” will go a lot further than “Do you like traveling?”) It’s less about collecting facts and more about making the other person feel seen and heard.

As you chat, pay attention to their body language and tone. If they light up talking about their favorite childhood movie, follow that thread instead of jumping to your next question. The most memorable conversations happen when you build on what someone just shared — it shows you’re listening and not just waiting for your turn to talk. And if they seem uncomfortable or give short answers, don’t force it! Sometimes the best connection comes from giving someone space to warm up.

Finally, keep the balance. The goal isn’t to pepper people with questions in the style of a reality TV confessional. Share your own stories, opinions, and “me too” moments along the way, staying mindful of how quickly you turn the conversation back to yourself. If the person you’re chatting with can barely finish answering a question before you’ve taken over the mic, it’ll seem like you’re only asking “get to know you” questions as a means to talk about yourself. Don’t let your desire to relate be what makes you unintentionally steamroll the other person!

Sprinkle in some follow-up questions, and keep your sharing in the spirit of connection. Some back-and-forth will make things feel like a true conversation instead of an interrogation, giving you both a chance to open up naturally. Before you know it, you’ll have skipped right past the small talk and into the good stuff — like our picks for the best “get to know you” questions below.

Questions to Ask Someone You Just Met
Chatting up someone new? Our tip: Nix “what are you studying?” or “what do you do for a living?” They’re clichés, and they rarely make for memorable conversation. Let that info come out naturally mid-chat instead, leading off with a more engaging “get to know you” question like the options below.

Did you grow up around here, or somewhere completely different?
What brought you to this city?
(Observation about your city or campus.) Have you noticed that, too?
What’s been the highlight of your week so far?
Have you discovered any cool spots in this neighborhood?
Do you have a go-to coffee or lunch spot?
What kind of music have you been into lately?
What’s your favorite sport to watch?
What’s the best book you’ve read recently?
Do you have any pets?
Have you discovered any great TV shows or podcasts recently?
Are you more of a morning person or a night owl?
Do you like trying new foods, or do you stick to your favorites?
What’s the last thing you watched that made you laugh out loud?
Do you enjoy going to live events, like concerts or theater?
Have you picked up any hobbies recently?
What’s your favorite way to spend a weekend?
Do you enjoy traveling, or do you prefer staying local?
What’s one thing you’ve been meaning to try but haven’t yet?
If someone was visiting for the first time, what’s one thing you’d tell them to do?
What’s your favorite thing you’ve done so far this month?
What’s the best thing you’ve done on a whim?
Do you have a favorite view in the city?
What’s one skill you’ve been wanting to learn?
What’s something you’re looking forward to right now?
What’s your favorite street or neighborhood to wander around?
What’s something you think this city/place does better than anywhere else?
Is there anything you cook or bake really, really well?
What’s a meal you’ve had here that you keep thinking about?
Have you found it easy or challenging to meet new people here?
What do you think the best museum nearby is?
What do you think the best outdoor spot nearby is?
Where do you go to buy (insert thing) around here?
This food/place/party is reminding me of XYZ. Have you been?
You seem like you might like (insert activity). Am I wrong?
Personal Questions to Get to Know Someone Better
So, you’ve met the person you’re chatting with a few times now, and you’re hoping to move past the casual-acquaintance stage. No sweat! Just try on for size one of the following questions to ask people to get to know them better.

Most Popular
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
TV
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
By Max Gao
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
Culture
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
By Alyssa Hardy
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
Culture
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
By Sara Delgado
What three words would you use to describe yourself?
What’s your favorite nickname someone has given you and how did you get it?
Do you believe in astrology? Why or why not?
Where is one place you’ve always dreamed of going?
If money were no object, what’s the first thing you would buy?
Does your family have any big traditions?
Do you have any “characters” in your family?
If you started a business, what would it be?
Do you enjoy being somewhere no one else knows you?
Where do you go for fresh inspiration?
What do you wish you did more of?
If you had the opportunity to redesign society, what would you change?
What impresses you the most?
What brings you the most joy?
What’s something that makes you feel overwhelmed?
Do you often listen to your intuition?
Do you like small talk?
What’s the best gift you’ve ever received?
What’s more important in life: excitement or stability?
Do you collect anything?
What’s something you’ve done recently for the first time?
What’s the first concert you ever went to?
Do you have a favorite way to celebrate small wins?
Do you enjoy taking the scenic route?
What’s one tradition you’ve made for yourself as an adult?
If you could instantly master any skill, what would it be?
What’s your go-to way to relax after a long day?
Is there a book or movie that’s had a big impact on you?
Do you prefer planning things out or being spontaneous?
What’s your go-to comfort meal?
What’s one errand or task you actually enjoy doing?
Do you like going to the same vacation spot or somewhere new each time?
What’s your favorite holiday or time of year?
Do you like road trips?
Have you ever kept a hobby going for years?
Deep Questions to Ask Someone (New or Old)
If small talk isn’t your thing, chances are you’re dying to get to the truly deep questions. There’s no rule saying you have to know someone for a certain amount of time before going deep; just make sure you’re paying attention to comfort cues and not forcing vulnerability on anyone! For a dash of levity, you can always mix in a fun “get to know you” question, too.

Most Popular
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
TV
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
By Max Gao
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
Culture
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
By Alyssa Hardy
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
Culture
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
By Sara Delgado
What is something that makes you feel unstoppable?
What is the biggest compliment you can give someone?
Would you call yourself brave?
When do you feel the safest?
What’s your favorite childhood memory?
What’s your biggest life regret so far?
What are you most grateful for in life?
What’s something you’re really bad at?
What’s a small act of kindness someone did for you that you’ll never forget?
What do you look for when finding new friends?
Are you a good gift giver?
Do you think you’re a friendly person?
Who do you admire most and why?
Have you ever had a spiritual experience?
What’s the quickest way someone can lose your trust?
Is it easy for you to accept help from people?
Do you live by any particular mantra?
How would you spend your last day on earth?
Do you consider yourself introspective?
What is your number one goal in life?
How do you hope people describe you?
Have you ever been in love?
Do you want your own family someday?
How do you define beauty in another person?
Do you think dreams have deeper meanings?
Do you often give people second chances?
What do you think happens to us after death?
What do you think makes someone a good person?
Have you ever experienced deja vu?
What is something that gives you hope?
What is something that makes you really angry?
Do you have a biggest fear?
How do you express your love for someone?
What does friendship mean to you?
What is something you consider too serious to joke about?
What does spirituality mean to you?
Have you ever had an epiphany?
Have you ever told a lie that you regretted?
What are you most proud of?
What’s your least favorite emotion?
What’s your least favorite part about being you?
How do you react to anger from others?
What’s a dealbreaker for you in a relationship?
What do you think it means to be healthy?
What do you love most about life?
Do you tend to trust people easily?
What is something you have never truly wrapped your head around?
Are you proud of yourself?
What do you consider your core values?
Do you think you have a true calling?
Do you hold grudges or do you let go of things easily?
What’s something that makes you envious?
Do you consider yourself a people pleaser?
What’s the toughest conversation you’ve ever had to have?
What’s your biggest insecurity?
What is one thing you think most people have and never appreciate enough?
How has your personality changed since you were a kid, if it has?
Fun “Get to Know You” Questions
Now that you’ve gotten all the talk about hopes and dreams out of the way, it’s time to get to the truly serious questions to get to know someone, like: ranch on pizza, always or no way? Expect some enthusiastic debates to come of the queries below.

Most Popular
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
TV
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
By Max Gao
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
Culture
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
By Alyssa Hardy
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
Culture
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
By Sara Delgado
Describe your perfect day.
What’s the best cereal?
What’s a movie you could watch every day?
Do you have a favorite memory?
What’s your dream career?
Which unconventional animal do you wish you could have as a pet?
Would you rather spend the day at an art museum or on a backcountry trail?
What is one super-specific museum you would visit?
What is the worst song, in your opinion?
If you could get rid of any genre of music, which would it be?
Would you rather have the ability to fly or the ability to teleport?
What is your claim to fame?
What is a skill you’ve always wanted to learn?
Do you have a favorite TV show?
What is your all-time favorite food?
What do you daydream about?
Do you have a morning routine?
What’s the most relaxing part of your day?
What are you most excited about for the future?
What do you think the ultimate theme party would be?
What’s on the top of your bucket list?
What do you think the worst job out there is?
If you have the opportunity to know the future, would you want to know?
Where is the most beautiful place you have ever seen in person?
Where is the fanciest place you’ve ever been?
What’s your favorite kind of weather?
Chappell Roan or Sabrina Carpenter?
Do you like cities or remote places better?
Would you survive a zombie apocalypse?
Do you have a favorite type of exercise?
Which phone app do you use the most?
Do you prefer cooking dinner or going out?
Do you believe in ghosts?
Are you good at solving puzzles?
Do you sing in the shower?
Are you double jointed in any way?
What’s the first thing you do in the morning?
Funny Questions to Ask Just for Laughs
Even if laughs are your aim with these “get to know you” funny questions, you’d be surprised what all you might learn about each other in the process. Let the banter begin!

Most Popular
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
TV
The Real World of Grace Van Patten & Jackson White
By Max Gao
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
Culture
Lizzy McAlpine Credits Milo Manheim for School Spirits Season 3 Gig: "He Just Talked to the Writers!"
By Alyssa Hardy
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
Culture
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
By Sara Delgado
If you could jump into a pool of anything, what would it be full of?
What’s the best wif-fi name you’ve seen?
What do you think the worst smell is?
Why are pizzas usually round?
What part of the driver’s test are you most likely to fail?
Do you talk to yourself?
Are you still scared of monsters?
What’s the funniest moment you’ve ever shared with a stranger?
What’s the weirdest fact you know?
When was the last time you made a prank call?
Have you ever fallen asleep in class?
If you could erase one color from existence, which one would it be?
Who is your most embarrassing celebrity crush?
What’s the most creative insult you can think of right now?
What is the most annoying musical instrument?
What is the weirdest thing in your home?
What’s the worst name you could give a pet?
What do you think people will be nostalgic for in 500 years?
Who would you elect the president of the internet?
Who are two people you would love to see box each other?
What’s the weirdest gift you’ve given?
Who is the biggest drama queen in your family?
What’s the worst pick-up line?
What would be the funniest superpower?
Would you choose uncontrollable farting over uncontrollable hiccuping?
Do you think dad jokes are played out?
Which celebrity would you choose as a mentor?
What dessert would you compare your best friend to?
What’s the wildest online purchase you’ve ever made?
If different fruits could talk, which would sound the funniest?
Is a burger a sandwich?
You have to choose one: eyelashes or eyebrows?
If your phone could talk, what’s the most embarrassing thing it would reveal about you?
If raindrops weren’t a thing, what would you want to fall from the sky?
What’s the silliest way you’ve ever gotten an injury?
What do you think your pet’s voice would sound like if they could talk?
What’s the worst bio you’ve ever seen on a dating app?
Made it through our full lineup of “get to know you” questions? Keep the conversation going with:

265 Thought-Provoking Questions to Ask a Girl (or Anyone You Want to Have a Conversation With)
151 Questions to Ask a Guy They’ll Actually Like Answering
301 This or That Questions for Friends, From Funny to Deep
187 Random Questions to Ask That Double as Ice Breakers
Find all questions stories here

Erika Owen is a writer, editor, and author of "The Art of Flaneuring: How to Wander with Intention and Discover a Better Life," "Lawbreaking Ladies: 50 Tales of Daring, Defiant, and Dangerous Women from History," and "Fodor's Essential Guide to Iceland." She has degrees in Magazine Journalism and International Relations ... Read More
Liv McConnell writes about entertainment, relationships and sexual wellness for Teen Vogue. While attending the University of Tennesee in Knoxville, her reporting on the story "Sound of Silence," which chronicled the aftermath of a student's sexual assault in her dorm room and examined why victims hesitate to report these types ... Read More
Keywords
friendship
questions
questions and answers
relationship
Never Miss a Story.
Get the Teen Vogue Daily Newsletter: the top celeb, style, and culture news all in one place.

SIGN UP
By signing up, you agree to our user agreement (including class action waiver and arbitration provisions), and acknowledge our privacy policy.
Read More
Is Heated Rivalry Getting a Special Episode Before Season 2?
TV
Is Heated Rivalry Getting a Special Episode Before Season 2?
Here’s everything we know so far.
By Sara Delgado
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
Culture
Is Tell Me Lies Ending With Season 3?
Here's everything you need to know about the series' future and ongoing season.
By Sara Delgado
The Legally Blonde Prequel Elle Finally Has a Premiere Date
Culture
The Legally Blonde Prequel Elle Finally Has a Premiere Date
And we are also getting a season 2! Find out everything you need to know about the long-anticipated show here.
By Sara Delgado
Everything You Need to Know About HBO's Harry Potter Series
TV
Everything You Need to Know About HBO's Harry Potter Series
From release date updates to the legendary composer behind the show's new score.
By Sara Delgado
NewJeans vs. ADOR: Danielle's Departure and Full Timeline of Events
Culture
NewJeans vs. ADOR: Danielle's Departure and Full Timeline of Events
Here's the latest on the group's legal battle.
By Sara Delgado
Grace Van Patten & Jackson White's First Date Was the Stuff of Rom-Coms
Culture
Grace Van Patten & Jackson White's First Date Was the Stuff of Rom-Coms
See their complete relationship timeline here.
By Sara Delgado
47 Best Anime Shows to Stream in 2026
TV
47 Best Anime Shows to Stream in 2026
For the new anime fans and the diehards. 📺
By Sara Delgado
Meet Aidan Delbis, the 19-Year-Old Monster-Obsessed Breakout Star of Bugonia
Movies
Meet Aidan Delbis, the 19-Year-Old Monster-Obsessed Breakout Star of Bugonia
The Southern California actor talks to Teen Vogue about autism representation and his dream future acting gig.
By Juan Velasquez
Forget Fashion Fads, This Laundry Detergent Is Taking Over My Life
Style
Forget Fashion Fads, This Laundry Detergent Is Taking Over My Life
And my sheets.
By P. Claire Dodson
5 Eyebrow Trends to Help Find the Best Style for You in 2026
Style
5 Eyebrow Trends to Help Find the Best Style for You in 2026
According to experts.
By Zoë Hecht
Pisces, Your Friends Are Here to Comfort You This Week
Spirituality
Pisces, Your Friends Are Here to Comfort You This Week
Dig into your weekly horoscope.
By Lisa Stardust
Hudson Williams Made His Runway Debut and Proved He's a Winter Sports Icon
Style
Hudson Williams Made His Runway Debut and Proved He's a Winter Sports Icon
Actor ✔️ Supermodel ✔️
By Donya Momenian
Teen Vogue
The young person’s guide to conquering (and saving) the world. Teen Vogue covers the latest in celebrity news, politics, fashion, beauty, wellness, lifestyle, and entertainment.
More from Teen Vogue

About Teen Vogue
Newsletter Signup
Video
Contact

Contact Us
Careers
User Agreement
Privacy Policy
Your California Privacy Rights
Accessibility Help
Condé Nast Store
Visual Stories
Site Map

Your Privacy Choices
© 2026 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Teen Vogue may earn a portion of sales from products that are purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

Get the 5 Types of Journaling that Improve Mental Health Cheat Sheet! SIGN UP
About
Contact
Courses
Shop
Disclosures
Blogging Tips
Therapy
Subscribe
About Social AnxietyAbout Social AnxietyStop Worrying. Start Living.
Mental Health
Self Care
Mindfulness
Social Anxiety
Diagnosis
Symptoms
Performance Anxiety
Treatment
Communication
Conversation Skills
Conversation Starters
Friendships
Social Living
Activities
Hosting
Events
Gift Giving
Holidays
Recommendations
100 Very Deep Conversation Starters (That Make You Think)
September 15, 2025 by Arlin Cuncic, M.A.

1
shares
Facebook
Twitter

Pinterest
Deep Conversation Starters
*This post may contain affiliate links, which means I receive a commission if you choose to purchase through links I provide (at no extra cost to you). Please see my disclosure policy.
Do you ever feel like your conversations just skim the surface? You might be craving connection but find yourself stuck in endless small talk about the weather or weekend plans. You’re not alone. Studies show that meaningful conversations are linked to greater happiness, yet many of us struggle to get there.

Deep conversation starters are questions that encourage you to share your beliefs, values, and experiences, moving beyond superficial topics. They invite vulnerability and self-reflection from both you and the person you’re talking with.

These prompts can help you build stronger bonds with friends, family, or even someone you’ve just met. If you’re looking for more ways to understand yourself and others, you might also find the exercises in The School of Life: An Emotional Education helpful.

Your Life & Experiences
Reflecting on your life is a powerful way to connect with someone. These questions invite you to share personal stories and pivotal moments that have shaped who you are today. Sharing these memories can build a foundation of trust and mutual understanding.

What is a moment in your life that you will never forget?
If you could give your younger self one piece of advice, what would it be?
What’s a challenge you’ve overcome that you’re proud of?
Describe a time when you felt completely out of your comfort zone.
What is one of your happiest memories?
Who has had the biggest impact on your life and why?
What is a lesson you had to learn the hard way?
If you could relive one day of your life, which would it be?
What’s something you used to believe that you no longer do?
How have you changed the most in the last five years?
Beliefs & Values
Our beliefs and values are the compass that guides our decisions. Discussing them helps you understand what truly matters to another person. These deep conversation starters can reveal someone’s core principles and the things they hold most dear.

What is one value you will not compromise on?
Do you believe in fate, free will, or a combination of both?
What does “success” mean to you?
What is a cause or issue you are passionate about?
What role does spirituality or religion play in your life?
Is it more important to be liked or to be respected?
What do you believe is the purpose of life?
How do you define a “good life”?
What is something you think everyone should experience at least once?
Do you think people are fundamentally good?
Hopes & Dreams
Everyone has hopes and dreams for the future. Talking about them can be inspiring and uplifting. These questions allow you to explore aspirations and what drives a person to keep moving forward. It’s a chance to see what excites them and what they are working towards.

If you could have any job in the world, what would it be?
What is a skill you’ve always wanted to learn?
Where do you see yourself in ten years?
What’s one thing you want to accomplish before you die?
If you could change one thing about the world, what would it be?
What does your ideal day look like?
What are you most looking forward to in the future?
If money were no object, how would you spend your time?
What is a dream you’ve had for a long time?
What legacy do you want to leave behind?
Fears & Vulnerabilities
Vulnerability is the cornerstone of deep connection. While it can be scary to open up, sharing fears can create a strong sense of intimacy and trust. These prompts should be used with care, in a safe and supportive environment.

What is your biggest fear?
What is something you’re insecure about?
Have you ever felt truly lonely?
What is a mistake you’ve made that you still think about?
When was the last time you cried and why?
What’s something that people often misunderstand about you?
What is your biggest regret?
Have you ever felt like you weren’t good enough?
What is a secret you’ve never told anyone?
What is something that makes you feel vulnerable?
Relationships & Connection
Our relationships with others are a huge part of our lives. These questions help explore how we connect with people and what we value in our friends, family, and partners. This is a great topic for building on an existing friendship.

What do you value most in a friendship?
How do you show someone you love them?
What is the most important lesson you’ve learned about relationships?
Is it possible to truly know another person?
Have you ever had your heart broken?
What makes you feel connected to someone?
What’s your definition of a healthy relationship?
What role does forgiveness play in your relationships?
Do you believe in soulmates?
What is the best relationship advice you’ve ever received?
Hypothetical Scenarios
Hypothetical questions can be fun and revealing. They push you to think creatively and consider situations you might not normally encounter. The answers can offer surprising insights into a person’s priorities and imagination.

If you could have one superpower, what would it be and why?
If you could have dinner with any three people, living or dead, who would you choose?
If you won the lottery tomorrow, what is the first thing you would do?
If you could travel back in time, where would you go?
If you knew you couldn’t fail, what would you do?
If you could live in any fictional world, which one would you choose?
If you had to describe yourself using three fictional characters, who would they be?
If you could know the absolute truth to one question, what would you ask?
If you could erase one event from history, what would it be?
If you were an animal, what would you be?
Creativity & The Mind
Exploring the mind and creativity can lead to fascinating discussions. These deep conversation starters touch on art, imagination, and how we perceive the world. They can uncover a person’s artistic side and their unique way of thinking.

What is the most beautiful thing you’ve ever seen?
What piece of art (music, film, painting) has moved you the most?
Where do you go when you need to think?
How do you recharge your creative energy?
Do you think technology is helping or hindering human creativity?
What’s a book that changed your perspective on something?
Do you consider yourself more of a logical or a creative person?
What does “beauty” mean to you?
What’s the most interesting idea you’ve heard recently?
How important is art in your life?
Society & The World
Thinking about the bigger picture can lead to some truly profound conversations. These questions address societal norms, global issues, and the human condition. They encourage you to think critically about the world we live in.

What is one thing you wish more people understood?
If you could pass one law that everyone in the world had to follow, what would it be?
What is the biggest challenge facing humanity today?
Do you think social media brings people closer together or drives them further apart?
What tradition do you think should be brought back?
What is something you believe is overrated in our society?
How can we create a more compassionate world?
What is your opinion on the current education system?
What does it mean to be a good citizen?
What social trend do you find most interesting?
Self-Discovery & Growth
Personal growth is a lifelong journey. These questions encourage reflection on how we learn, change, and become better versions of ourselves. They are perfect for sharing insights and discoveries about one’s own character.

What’s something you’re currently working on improving about yourself?
What does it mean to be “authentic”?
How do you practice self-care?
What is the best compliment you have ever received?
What quality do you admire most in others?
When do you feel most like yourself?
What has been your greatest personal achievement?
What is a habit you’d like to break?
How do you handle criticism?
What is something new you’ve learned about yourself recently?
Happiness & Fulfilment
What truly brings us joy? This is a fundamental question that can lead to some of the most meaningful discussions. These prompts explore the sources of happiness and what fulfilment looks like for different people.

What brings you the most joy in your daily life?
Do you believe happiness is a choice?
What’s the difference between happiness and contentment?
Describe a moment when you felt completely at peace.
What activities make you lose track of time?
What is something small that always makes you smile?
What role does gratitude play in your life?
What does a fulfilling life look like to you?
Do you think pursuing happiness is the ultimate goal?
What are you most grateful for right now?
How to Begin a Deeper Dialogue
Starting a deep conversation doesn’t have to be intimidating. Begin by finding a comfortable and private setting where you won’t be interrupted. Most importantly, be a good listener. Pay attention to the answers, ask follow-up questions, and share your own thoughts honestly. The goal is not to get through a list of questions, but to build a genuine connection.

What’s a deep question you love to ask? Share it in the comments below!

How to Double Your Social Confidence in 5 Minutes"
Check out this free training offered by the experts at Social Self!

How to use "Conversational Threading" to avoid awkward silence
The proven way to get past boring small talk
Instantly beat self-consciousness with the "OFC-method"
Busting the myth that you have to get a "more interesting life" to be more interesting"
Start my free training


Related Posts About Conversation Starters
250 Powerful Conversation Starters (You Need to Try)
100 Irresistibly Good Date Night Conversation Starters (Guaranteed)
How to Keep a Conversation Going (Every Time)
WANT TO REMEMBER THIS? SAVE 100 VERY DEEP CONVERSATION STARTERS TO YOUR FAVORITE PINTEREST BOARD!

100 Very Deep Conversation Starters (that Make You Think)
Filed Under: Communication, Conversation Starters

« 25 Quick Halloween Appetizers Your Guests Will Love100 Journal Prompts for Jealousy (to Actually Feel Better) »
Leave a Reply
Your email address will not be published. Required fields are marked *

Comment *

Name *

Email *

Website



Hi there, my name is Arlin. I help you stop worrying what people think so you can live the life you want. You can learn more about me here.

Search this website
Amazon Associates Disclosure
About Social Anxiety is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC Associates Program, an affiliate advertising program designed to provide a means for sites to earn fees by linking to Amazon.com and affiliate sites. Click here to read the full disclosure policy.

Browse by Category

Select Category
Browse by Date

Select Month
Join 350,000+ followers!
Copyright © 2026 · anchored theme by Restored 316
1
shares

Skip to Content
Search
Conversation Starters World
Conversation starters
Conversation games
Dating
Thought-provoking
Trivia Questions
Other questions
English
250 Conversation Starters
Here are some great questions for starting a conversation. There are a lot of random conversation starters to get you started and then conversation questions listed by topic. You can start with the random questions or find a topic that interests you. There’s no right place to start, just scroll down to wherever you want and get started!

There are tons of ways to use these questions. I find that the most rewarding way is for everyone to pull up this list of conversation starters on a phone or tablet, and then take turns letting everyone choose a question to ask the group. Remember don’t be afraid to delve deeply into the conversation. Answering the specific question isn’t the goal, having an interesting conversation is!

Table of Contents
Random Conversation Starters
TV Conversation Starters
Movie Conversation Starters
Book Conversation Starters
Music Conversation Starters
App Conversation Starters
Phone Conversation Starters
Sports Conversation Starters
Restaurant Conversation Starters
Travel Conversation Starters
Technology Conversation Starters
Clothes / Fashion Conversation Starters
Goals Conversation Starters
Seasons Conversation Starters
Holiday Conversation Starters
Education Conversation Starters
Food Conversation Starters
Weird Conversation Starters
Even more questions
The title would have you believe that there are 250 questions, but there are actually more. I’m sure you don’t mind a few more questions, right? Dig in and start having some great conversation questions!

Random Conversation Starters
Here are some conversation starters that span all kinds of topics.

1. What was the last funny video you saw?
Always fun to follow up on the question by watching the video they thought was funny. I’m sure you’ve got a few funny videos to share as well.

2. What do you do to get rid of stress?
Everyone gets stressed out at times, and everyone deals with it differently. Find out how they deal with it and maybe pick up some extra stress relief tips for you.

3. What is something you are obsessed with?
This is a great question because you can follow up with lots of questions about what they are obsessed with. I guarantee they’ll have plenty to talk about when it comes to what they geek out on.

4. What three words best describe you?
Find out how they view themselves, and don’t forget to ask follow-up questions about each of the words they chose.

5. What would be your perfect weekend?
See what they are into, and you’ll have plenty to talk about. Everyone loves talking about things they love.

6. What’s your favorite number? Why?
This one is a little off the wall, but you never know, you might get an interesting answer. Especially by asking, “why?”

7. What are you going to do this weekend?
Very similar to the last one, another oldie but a goodie.

8. What’s the most useful thing you own?
Sure, this one is good for a general conversation starter, but what is really nice is being able to get some ideas on what works well and is generally awesome to have.

9. What’s your favorite way to waste time?
Similar to the perfect weekend question, this question tries to get at what they really enjoy doing so that you can both talk about that.

10. What do you think of tattoos? Do you have any?
If they do have tattoos, there is probably a story behind each one. And if they don’t have any, well it’s good to know what they think about them.

11. Do you have any pets? What are their names?
Are they an animal person? And how clever are the names they gave their pets?

12. Where did you go last weekend? / What did you do last weekend?
A pretty common conversation starter, but sometimes the best ones are the ones people are used to.

13. What is something popular now that annoys you?
Time to channel some cranky old man vibes. Kids these days, with their stuff and their things and their hair. You know, that type of stuff.

14. What did you do on your last vacation?
Vacation stories! Bad or good, everyone likes talking about their vacation. Just duck out before they start showing you pictures.

15. When was the last time you worked incredibly hard?
Whether it’s their job or a personal project, you can see what they put their heart and soul into.

16. Are you very active, or do you prefer to just relax in your free time?
Find out if they are all about the gym or all about the couch. To each their own!

17. What do you do when you hang out with your friends?
See what they like to do when they are social, talk about that activity if you can.

18. Who is your oldest friend? Where did you meet them?
This is a great question because it often leads to some wonderful stories from when they were younger. I mean, who doesn’t like reminiscing about the good old days?

19. What’s the best / worst thing about your work/school?
Tailor this question to the person you are talking to, whether they work, or they are a student. Also, some people like to let off steam, and some like to keep it positive so you can choose which way you want the question to swing.

20. If you had intro music, what song would it be? Why?
This question can lead to a good conversation about their favorite song or the music they like.

21. What were you really into when you were a kid?
Every kid goes through phases when they are REALLY into one thing. Now you can find out what they obsessed about when they were a kid.

22. If you could have any animal as a pet, what animal would you choose?
This one is fun because a blank check pet choice can lead to some great answers. And you can always transition the conversation into pets they had/have.

23. Have you ever saved an animal’s life? How about a person’s life?
Who doesn’t like listening to or telling a hero story? I’m sure it will lead to an interesting story. Even if it isn’t about them, and just about someone they know who saved an animal or person’s life.

24. If you opened a business, what kind of business would it be?
This one can really be a huge conversation starter if the person you are talking to is in anyway entrepreneurial. It’s always fun to hear and discuss new business ideas. Don’t forget to ask for lots of details about their dream business.

25. Who is your favorite entertainer (comedian, musician, actor, etc.)?
Pop culture and entertainment are great topics for conversation, and this question is a good entry point into a larger conversation about what kind of entertainment they like.

26. Are you a very organized person?
Does everything have its place, or does their stuff roam about?

27. Have you ever given a presentation in front of a large group of people? How did it go?
Public speaking is high up there on the biggest fears people have. So, I’m sure if they have, it probably left a big impression.

28. What is the strangest dream you have ever had?
Sure, talking about dreams can be dull, but who knows, if you are talking about the strangest dream they’ve EVER had, it might be pretty interesting. Or not. Let’s see!

29. What is a controversial opinion you have?
So, don’t immediately start bashing their opinion if you don’t like it. I mean, you asked the question after all. Let them explain why they have the opinion and their reasoning behind it. Not everyone has to have the same opinions as you. And if it’s super out there or evil, well it’s good to know so you can avoid them in the future.

Who in your life brings you the most joy?
30. Who in your life brings you the most joy?
An awesome question for keeping it positive, and they’ll be talking about someone they love, so it’ll be easy to jump into a conversation about whoever that person is and why they are so awesome.

31. Who had the biggest impact on the person you have become?
This one may or may not have the same answer as the previous question, so you might want to choose either this one or the previous one depending on the type of conversation you want to have.

32. What is the most annoying habit someone can have?
Find out what annoys them, chances are it probably annoys you too. Then it’s easy to step into a conversation about annoying habits.

33. Where is the most beautiful place you have been?
This one will probably lead to a good travel story. And conversations about travel are always fun.

34. Where do you spend most of your free time/day?
Find out what their day to day looks like. It’ll be easy to start up a conversation about anything of the things they do on the regular.

35. Who was your best friend in elementary school?
Time to get nostalgic about how life was when you both were growing up!

36. How often do you stay up past 3 a.m.?
Are they a night owl or an early bird, time to find out! This can easily transition into a conversation about what they like to do in their free time.

37. What’s your favorite season? Why?
This question will probably conjure up some wonderful memories linked to your and their favorite season. Have fun reminiscing!

38. Which is more important, having a great car or a great house? Why?
Do they care more about showing off to others or having awesome stuff for themselves? Always good to know! And you can easily transition into a conversation about cars you/they want or dream houses.

39. What animal or insect do you wish humans could eradicate?
Probably going to get a lot of mosquito answers. But depending on where you are and if they have a special hatred for a creature, you might get a different answer. If you get the mosquito answer, you could always talk about the best way to get rid of the evil pokey buzzing things.

40. Where is the most beautiful place near where you live?
Similar to the question about the most beautiful place they’ve seen but this time it’s local! Who knows, you might get a tip on an awesome local spot.

41. What do you bring with you everywhere you go?
Sure, you’ll get the normal keys, cellphone, purse/wallet, answers, but you might get to hear about a cool keepsake / lucky charm that means a lot to them.

42. How much time do you spend on the internet? What do you usually do?
Find out what sites they enjoy, chances are you probably enjoy some of the same sites. You can swap good people to follow or suggestions for interesting sites.

43. What is the most disgusting habit some people have?
An earlier question talked about annoying habits; now it’s time to get gross with it and find out what disgusts them.

44. Where and when was the most amazing sunset you have ever seen?
This one is another way to get into a good conversation about travel.

45. Which recent news story is the most interesting?
So, I had to make this one a bit vague, but it can lead to an interesting conversation about recent events. And you might just hear about something you didn’t know happened. Just make sure to steer clear of politics.

46. Where is the worst place you have been stuck for a long time?
Whether it’s at an airport, after a car broke down, or something else, we’ve all had times where we’ve had to wait for a seemingly endless amount of time. There is a good chance it’ll lead to a good story.

47. If you had to change your name, what would your new name be?
This one is a little creative and fun. They might have to think about it for a bit, or they may have an answer right off. Don’t forget to ask them why and what might be a good last name as well.

48. What is something that really annoys you but doesn’t bother most people?
Everybody likes sharing and complaining about what annoys them. Now you can find out what weird quirks annoy them.

49. What word or saying from the past do you think should come back?
There are all kinds of words and sayings from the past that have fallen out of use. It can be a lot of fun to dust them off and put them into modern sentences. If you both can’t think of any, there are plenty of lists online.

50. How should success be measured? And by that measurement, who is the most successful person you know?
This question can lead to some surprisingly deep answers. A lot of how we view the world is based on what we consider to be worthwhile, and this question tries to get at the heart of that to find out what is most important to the person.

51. What is your guilty pleasure?
Everyone has something they absolutely love but might not be in line with how people view them or how they view themselves.

52. Was there ever an event in your life that defied explanation?
Time to learn about some cool mysteries! This one quite often leads to several good stories.

53. If you could learn the answer to one question about your future, what would the question be?
A fun question that helps you figure out what is important to them.

54. Has anyone ever saved your life?
This one can get quite personal and sometimes tragic. So just a heads up, you might want to save this one for when you know the person well.

55. What benefit do you bring to the group when you hang out with friends?
Every member of a group has their duties. Time to find out what role they play! Plus, you can expand the conversation into what they usually do when they hang out with different groups of friends. And if you want more questions to ask friends, we’ve got ’em.

56. How often do you curse? And what’s your go-to string of curse words?
This question is definitely unique. You’ll have to judge the situation and who you are talking to in order to see if this question is a good fit for the situation. It can be fun, though.

57. What trends did you follow when you were younger?
Each generation has its trends. And if you are of a similar age, there is a good chance that you both share some similar trends that you followed.

58. What do you fear is hiding in the dark?
This is a great question to get into a conversation about fears that you both share.

59. What was the best period of your life so far? What do you think will be the best period of your entire life?
Another question that leads to a lot of fond memories and stories to tell, but also lets you know how hopeful of the future they are and what their ideal life would look like.

60. What do you do to improve your mood when you are in a bad mood?
Everyone needs to blow off steam sometimes. With this question, you can see if you share some stress relief techniques.

61. What is the silliest fear you have?
Another one about fear, but this one is more lighthearted. Everyone has fears that they know are irrational.

62. What are some things you want to accomplish before you die?
The classic bucket list question. It’s great because it shows you what they want out of life and what is most important to them. And it’s easy to split off into a conversation about any of the things they mention.

63. What is the best room in your house? Why?
Are the all about food and the kitchen? Perhaps they prefer to sleep or chill on the sofa? Or maybe there is a special reading nook they have. This is another question that helps get a conversation going about what they do in their downtime.

64. Who is someone popular now that you really like? Why do you like them so much?
This one serves as a great stepping stone into a conversation about celebrities and other people in the limelight.

65. Where is the best place to take a date?
This one you’ll have to be selective with, it’s not appropriate for all situations, but you might be able to get the low down on a good spot you didn’t know about. Just don’t let the conversation stray into their dating life, that can get a bit awkward. And if you need date ideas, we have 200!

66. What smell brings back great memories?
Cookies at Christmas time, the smell of gas on a road trip, the salty air of the ocean. Smell has a strong link to memories and can be a great conversation starter.

67. What’s the best pet name you can come up with for a specific type of pet?
Go for funny names, puns make great animal names. And you could tailor it for a pet that they have or would like to get.

68. How often do you help others? Who do you help? How do you help?
This is a great question to see how empathetic and prosocial they are. And can lead to conversations about volunteering or times they’ve helped others.

69. What are you best at?
With this one, you might learn about a hidden talent, or perhaps a hobby you didn’t know about. Both can be the beginning of an excellent conversation.

70. What makes you nervous?
Very similar to the fear one but a little bit broader. It can be something happening in their life right now, something that happens regularly, or something they think is likely to happen in the future.

71. Who is the funniest person you’ve met?
Not necessarily a comedian, but a friend or family member who always manages to make them laugh. It definitely could spin off into a conversation about comedians, though, which would also be fun.

72. What weird or useless talent do you have?
Wiggling ears, burping the alphabet, farting on command, humans are weird, and we all have some weird and useless talents that are fun to talk about.

73. What are some strange beliefs that some people have?
Be careful with this one, because they may end up labeling one of your beliefs as strange. Just be ready not to take their answer too personally.

74. Who would be the worst person to be stuck in an elevator with? How about the best person to be stuck in an elevator with?
Hypothetical questions can be a blast to talk about. And this is a fun one to ponder.

75. What was the best birthday wish or gift you’ve ever received?
Hopefully, everyone has had a super thoughtful birthday wish or gift given to them. It’s a perfect question to get in a conversation about past birthdays.

For more random questions try our random questions to ask friends.

TV Conversation Starters
With so much great TV out there, it’s a great way to jump into a conversation.

76. What’s the best sitcom past or present?
Chances are you probably binge-watched it as well, so it’s a great way to talk about a shared interest.

77. What’s the best show currently on TV?
Get ready for a lively debate, this is a golden age of TV, and everyone has their favorites.

78. What will be the future of TV shows?
There has been such a shakeup in the TV show marketplace that who knows what is coming next and where TV is headed. There is much speculation to be done!

79. How often do you binge watch shows?
They have, you have, we all have. But the real question is which ones and how often? Is it the same old show or something new each time? Perhaps you’ll even find your next binge-worthy show.

80. What cartoons did you watch as a child?
Even if you or the person you are talking to didn’t grow up in the age of Saturday morning cartoons, you both probably still have some beloved childhood cartoons.

81. What’s the funniest TV series you have seen?
Perfect for starting a conversation about a show you both are into, and if you haven’t watched the show they mention, you now have a new show to check out!

82. Which TV show do you want your life to be like?
I think secretly everyone wants to inhabit one of their favorite shows. Or maybe it’s just me. Just don’t forget to ask them why and get lots of details.

83. How have TV shows changed over the years?
Depending on how old the person you are talking with is, this might be a rich vein of conversation. Boy howdy has TV changed a lot over the years.

84. If you could bring back one TV show that was canceled, which one would you bring back?
We all have that one show that was so good we can’t believe it got canceled *cough* Firefly *cough*. Find out what show they fell in love with.

85. What do you think about game shows? Do you have a favorite one?
While they have fallen a bit out of favor, whoever you are talking to probably has a special love for at least one game show.

86. What’s the most underrated or overrated TV show?
Whichever way they choose to answer will probably lead to a pretty interesting conversation about the merits and failures of several TV shows.

87. What do you think about reality TV? Why do you think it’s so popular?
Love it or hate it, reality TV is huge. Now you can have a conversation about why it’s so popular. If you are looking for a simpler, more direct question, you can try the next one.

88. Do you like reality TV shows? Why or why not? If so, which ones?
Very similar to the previous one but a little narrower. I definitely wouldn’t ask both of these, but either one will probably get you a good conversation going.

Movie Conversation Starters
Everyone loves a good movie, so why not make it a conversation topic!

89. What is the most overrated movie?
But if you ask this question, don’t get offended because they start hating on a movie you love. Ask them why, and just remember everyone is entitled to their own opinion.

90. What’s your favorite genre of movie?
Pretty typical conversations starter, but a great jumping-off point for a discussion about their favorite movies.

91. Which do you prefer? Books or movies?
Feel free to transition this one into books made from movies, movies adapted from books, or just a general conversation about books or movies.

92. What movie scene choked you up the most?
We’ve all got that scene that consistently chokes us up. Find out what movie brings a tear to their eye or which movie brings on a full sobbing fit.

93. Do you like documentaries? Why / why not?
Perfect for starting a great conversation about the best and worst documentaries you’ve both seen.

94. What’s the worst movie you have seen recently?
There is definitely no shortage of bad movies to pick from, so I’m sure they’ll be able to think of at least a couple of really bad movies. You can also transition into a conversation about what makes a movie bad and what tropes you hate in movies.

95. What’s the strangest movie you have ever seen?
There are some BIZARRE movies out there. I’m sure you’ve seen a few, but if you haven’t, treat yourself. There is nothing quite like a movie so strange and terrible that it’s entertaining on a whole new level.

96. Do you like horror movies? Why or why not?
It’s weird, but people seem to either really like horror movies, or they are just not into them. There don’t seem to be a lot of people on the fence that can take them or leave them.

97. When was the last time you went to a movie theater?
You can use this question to start up a conversation about the movie they saw, the local theater, or movie theaters in general.

98. What was the last movie you watched? How was it?
Maybe you saw it too, or maybe you’ll get a good recommendation for a movie you wouldn’t normally consider.

99. Do movies have the same power as books to change the world?
This one is kind of a heavy one, so you might not want to drop it to start a conversation with someone you just met. Or maybe that’s your jam, you do you.

100. Do you prefer to watch movies in the theater or in the comfort of your own home?
Big screen and big sound vs. comfort and convenience. Either way, I think we can agree, movies are pretty awesome.

Book Conversation Starters
Here are some conversation starters for the book lovers out there.

101. What was the last book you read?
A good question to see what kind of books they are into. And if they really liked the book, well now you’ve got a good recommendation.

102. What was your favorite book as a child?
This can either be one when they were really young or when they were young adults. It’s another question to draw out some fond memories.

103. Do you prefer physical books or ebooks?
They both have their good points and drawbacks, and often people have a definite preference.

104. What is the longest book you’ve read?
This one isn’t a competition. But it is great for finding good books. If they finished the whole thing, it must have been good!

105. What book genres do you like to read?
It’s funny how even people who read a lot of books usually lean heavily in the direction of two or three genres.

106. How fast do you read?
Again, not a competition. No bragging. Just a fun question for folks who love books.

107. How often do you go to the library?
This question is perfect for starting a conversation about how libraries are changing and your local library. Did you know some libraries are starting to loan tools and cooking supplies as well as books? Very cool.

108. What book has influenced you the most?
Whether they read it recently or long ago, there is probably one book that has stuck with them over the years.

109. Do you prefer fiction or nonfiction books?
Don’t forget to ask why they prefer one over the other and get some recommendations for their choice.

What book has changed one of your long-held opinions?
110. What book has changed one of your long-held opinions?
Books have the power to shape and change how we view the world. Usually for the better.

111. What book has had the biggest effect on the modern world?
This is another one of those questions that can get quite deep and philosophical quite quickly. So, make sure to take stock of the situation before busting this one out.

112. What was the worst book you had to read for school? How about the best book you had to read for school?
We all had to read lots of books for school, and you both probably read some of the same books. You might have come away with very similar or very different opinions of the books, either way it can lead to a good conversation.

113. Do you think people read more or fewer books now than 50 years ago?
Sure, the knee jerk reaction is to say definitely people read more in the past. But with the spread of so many screens, I’m not so sure.

114. Now that indie publishing has become easier, have books gotten better or worse?
Or perhaps stayed the same, one thing is for sure, there are a ton more books out there.

Music Conversation Starters
Time to pump the jam! And by pump the jam, I mean ask conversation questions about music.

115. What was the last song you listened to?
Have they been playing a new favorite on repeat, reminiscing, or just trying something new?

116. What is your favorite movie soundtrack?
Definitely some great soundtracks out there and of course, some really horrible ones as well. Feel free to transition into a conversation about movies or game soundtracks or whatever.

117. Do you like classical music?
This is another space where some people are really into it, and some people hate it.

118. What song always puts you in a good mood?
Which song is their feel-good go to? Feel free to steal it. Everyone needs more feel-good music in their life.

119. What’s the best way to discover new music?
There is a ton to talk about here with all the new music platforms; it’s never been easier to get music, whether it’s easier to find good new music is debatable.

120. How has technology changed the music industry?
This is a really broad topic with a lot of avenues to follow and can really lead to some excellent conversations.

121. Are there any songs that always bring a tear to your eye?
Whether it triggers a bittersweet memory or is just a sad song, most folks have a song that chokes them up a bit.

122. What bands or types of music do you listen to when you exercise?
I can almost guarantee if they are into exercise, they have a particular type of music that works for them. And lots of types that definitely don’t.

123. Which do you prefer, popular music or relatively unknown music?
No judgment, lots of people get uptight about what music people should or should not like. But hey it’s not your ears. Come to this question with an open mind.

124. Do you like going to concerts? Why or why not? What was the last concert you went to?
There are people who think concerts are alright, and those who REALLY love concerts. This can easily lead to a good conversation about concerts they’ve been to.

125. Who was the first band or musician you were really into? Do you still like them?
So, this will probably pull up some cheesy music memories, and that’s always fun. We all have some cheesy music in our past and present, embrace it.

126. Records, tapes, CDs, MP3s, streaming. Which did you grow up with? What is good and bad about each?
Yeah, this one is going to vary greatly depending on the age of the person you are talking to. Just don’t get all elitist about your preferred method of getting music to your ears, it’s not a good look.

App Conversation Starters
We’ve all got a ton on our phone, why not have a conversation about apps?

127. What are the three best apps on your phone?
App recommendation time! Go find you some awesome new apps.

128. What is the most useful app on your phone?
Similar to the last but a bit more specific, and although it might not be one of their favorites, it’s one that they can’t live without.

129. What do app makers do that really annoys you?
The ads? The microtransactions? Bait and switch tactics? There are some really annoying and shady things about apps that annoy a lot of people.

130. How many apps do you have on your phone?
I’m willing to bet they have no idea, and you probably don’t either. Heck, even I don’t. Now you can count them up and compare. And probably be surprised at how many apps you have on your phone.

131. What’s the most frustrating app you have tried?
Whether it be a malfunctioning app or a really frustrating game, there are plenty of apps that get rage deleted. And you might even learn about some that you want to avoid.

132. What’s the most addictive game on your phone you have played?
We’ve all been there. Sure, you know you should quit, but it’s just so good! Looking for another addicting game? Try some of our conversation games like never have I ever, 21 questions game, truth or dare, or our would you rather questions.

133. Which app seemed like magic the first time you used it?
With all the tech around us, we often forget how cool it really is. I’m sure there were apps you tried in the past, and you were just dumbfounded with how amazing they were.

134. What is the strangest app you have heard of or tried?
Oh, there are some weird ones out there. Now you can swap stories of bizarre apps. And if you don’t know of any, just Google them and be amazed.

135. What’re the best and worst things about the marketplace where you get your apps?
While probably not the most thrilling conversation starter, whoever you are talking about probably has a bit to say about where they get their apps.

136. Which app has helped society the most? Which one has hurt society the most?
This one can get into a really deep conversation about technology and society. Or not. It depends on how the conversation flows. Either way I’m sure you’ll be able to get into a good conversation with this one.

137. An app mysteriously appears on your phone that does something amazing. What does it do?
Everyone loves a good hypothetical. So, what does your mysterious/magical app do?

Phone Conversation Starters
We’ve all got a phone, so we’ve all got something in common to talk about.

138. How often do you check your phone?
Answers will vary, wildly. Some people hate checking their phone, some do it compulsively.

139. Do you text more or call more? Why?
While there are outliers, the answer to this one will depend a LOT on age. And probably they have strong opinions about their preference, which always makes for a good conversation. As long as you don’t start arguing with them.

140. What will phones be like in 10 years?
Pure speculation, but why not? Speculation is fun, and who knows, you or the person you are talking to might be right with your guesses.

141. What do you wish your phone could do?
They are getting better and better, but are they getting better in the way you want them to? What features would you like to see in the next round of phones?

142. Do you always have to have the latest phone?
There are basically three camps. The early adopter camp, the “it ain’t broke, don’t fix it” camp, and the “I hate new technology” camp. Find out which one they are in.

143. What is the most annoying thing about your phone?
Phones, it’s often a love-hate relationship. Now you can both complain about your phones. Together!

144. How do you feel if you accidentally leave your phone at home?
For some people, they get REALLY anxious without their phone, and for some it’s just a minor inconvenience.

What do you wish your phone could do?
145. What kind of case do you have for your phone? Why did you choose it?
This is another one that people sometimes get really passionate about, and some don’t. It might lead to a good conversation, or they might just say, “I don’t know, I just liked how it looked.”

146. What was your first smartphone? How did you feel when you got it?
Whether young or old. You’ll always remember your first.

147. Do you experience phantom vibration? (Feeling your phone vibrate even though it didn’t.)
This one goes along with the compulsive checking of phones. But I think it’s a pretty common phenomenon.

Sports Conversation Starters
Sports! There’s a reason it’s one of the most popular conversation topics.

148. What sports do you like to watch?
Try to find one that you both have in common, or you both follow. Once you find it, the rest of the conversation will flow naturally.

149. Who are some of your favorite athletes?
If you are into sports, you have favorite athletes. Find out who their favorite athletes are and why they like them.

150. Which sports do you like to play
This may be very similar to which sports they like to watch, or it could be a completely different list. Either way, talking about something the person is passionate about is always a great way to have a good conversation.

151. What is the hardest sport to excel at?
This one is pretty debatable. The case could be made for plenty of sports. Give this question a go and see if you both agree.

152. Who are the 3 greatest athletes of all time?
Another one that you can debate a lot about. Probably easiest to pick a sport to narrow it down first, though.

153. How much time do you spend watching sports in a week?
This one probably depends a lot on their favorite sport, and the season it’s played in. Or they might just be super into sports. Or they might not like sports. But if they don’t like sports, then why are you talking to them about sports?

154. Do athletes deserve the high salaries they receive? Why or why not?
This one can be a little contentious at times. But it should lead to a lively conversation no matter what side of the coin they fall on.

155. What defines a sport? Is fishing a sport? How about video game tournaments?
This one can lead to an excellent conversation because everyone has an opinion, and all the opinions are on a sliding scale. There is definitely a limit on what someone will consider a sport.

156. Do you play in any fantasy sports leagues? If so, how into fantasy sports are you?
There a lot of people who are REALLY into fantasy sports. If the person you are talking to is into it, they are more than happy to have a conversation about their team.

157. Why do you think sports are common across almost all cultures present and past?
This is a little deeper than the normal sports question. But it can lead to an interesting conversation about human nature with a bit of a sports spin.

158. Do you play sports video games? Which ones? Is playing the video game or playing the sport more fun? Why?
If they like sports, there is a good chance they play some kind of video game involving sports. Even if it is just an app on their phone.

159. Which sport is the most exciting to watch? Which is the most boring to watch?
Oh yeah, everyone has an opinion about this one.

Restaurant Conversation Starters
Nearly everyone enjoys going out to eat at a restaurant. So, here are some questions to help you have a conversation about restaurants!

160. What restaurant do you eat at most?
Which one is their go-to restaurant? This will probably tell you a lot about what types of restaurants they like.

161. What’s the worst fast food restaurant?
A lot of fast food is pretty terrible, so which is the worst?

162. What is the best restaurant in your area?
It may be their local go-to restaurant, or it might be one that they only eat at for special occasions.

163. What is the fanciest restaurant you have eaten at?
The sky is the limit, and so this one will probably lead to a good story. You can also branch off into a conversation about ridiculously expensive foods or things in general.

164. What kind of interior do you like a restaurant to have?
Bright and modern, dim and cozy, more like a bar, lots of kitsch? Restaurant décor comes in almost as many flavors as food. So, what do you and they like the most? Or the least?

165. What is the worst restaurant you have ever eaten at?
We’ve all got one, and they are always entertaining to hear about.

166. If you opened a restaurant, what kind of food would you serve?
This is another one that a lot of people have thought about. For some reason opening a restaurant appeals to a lot of people and so you’ll probably get an interesting answer for this one.

167. What is the strangest themed restaurant you have heard of?
If you haven’t heard of strangely themed restaurants, boy howdy are you in for a roller coaster. Just Google it, people go buck wild with restaurant themes.

168. Would you eat at a restaurant that was really dirty if the food was amazing?
How close to the food poisoning sun do you want to fly, Icarus?

169. What is the most disgusting thing you have heard happened at a restaurant?
This one piggybacks on to the last question. We’ve all heard horror stories. Now it’s your turn share yours and to hear theirs.

170. What was your favorite restaurant when you were a child?
I find that a lot of people have really strong favorites when it comes to this period in their life.

Travel Conversation Starters
Whether it is near or far, everyone loves a good vacation.

171. Where would you like to travel next?
Most people have a spot they have their eyes and heart on. Find out where it is, maybe you’ve been and can give them some tips.

172. What is the longest plane trip you have taken?
Who doesn’t love long plane trips? Everyone! Everyone hates long plane rides. So, find out about their horror stories and share your own.

173. What’s the best way to travel? (Plane, car, train, etc.)
This one probably varies a lot, depending on what country you are in. But usually people have a favorite they like to talk about.

174. Where is the most relaxing place you have been?
Are they more of a beach and chill or a cabin and chill kind of person? Find out with this question.

175. Do you prefer traveling alone or with a group?
They both have their benefits and drawbacks. And almost everyone has a preference. Plus, it’s a great starting point to talk about previous trips they’ve taken.

176. What do you think of tour group packages?
This one is somewhat similar to the last one but a little more specific. If you’ve already covered a lot of tour group ground with the last question, feel free to skip this one.

177. Do you prefer to go off the beaten path when you travel?
Whether it’s literally going off the beaten path like when they are hiking, or just the figurative beaten path like a guidebook, you can use this question to find out how adventurous they like to be.

178. What was the most overhyped place you’ve traveled to?
If you’ve traveled to any popular destinations, you may have come across this. So much hype. But a big letdown once you get there.

179. Have you traveled to any different countries? Which ones?
Depending on what country you are both from the answers to this question vary a lot. Are you in the US? You might find most people haven’t left the country or have just been to one or two other countries. Asking in Europe? You’ll probably get a ton of travel stories about different countries.

180. Where is the most awe-inspiring place you have been?
This is great for getting new travel ideas for yourself. And if you’ve been there, you can talk about your experience too.

181. What’s the best thing about traveling? How about the worst thing?
Again, this will vary a lot based on who you are talking to and how they travel. But chances are they have pretty strong feelings about both questions.

182. What is the worst hotel you have stayed at? How about the best hotel?
So many bad hotels out there. Get ready for some horror stories about gross stuff. Or you know, a tip about a sweet hotel you can try. It depends on how the conversation goes.

183. How do you think traveling to a lot of different countries changes a person?
Someone once said you are the same person you were 5 years ago except for the places you’ve been, the people you’ve met, and the books you’ve read. So, what do you think travel does to someone?

184. Talk about some of the interesting people you have met while traveling.
Oh, this one leads to rich veins of great stories. I’m sure you have a lot of stories about interesting characters you’ve met, and they probably do too.

185. What do you think of staycations? (Vacationing and seeing tourist attractions where you live.)
Some people love them, and some don’t see the point. Either way, there is plenty to talk about!

186. Where do you get your recommendations for what to do and where to stay when you travel?
Is it from fellow travelers, guidebooks, the internet, social media, or a combination?

Technology Conversation Starters
Tech, some hate it, and some love it, but even those who love it probably have a love/hate thing going on with it. Either way, it makes for some great conversation questions!

187. What is your favorite piece of technology that you own?
Let’s start it out positive and see what kind of tech they rely on.

188. What piece of technology is really frustrating to use?
And now, let’s look at the dark side of tech when it just doesn’t work the way we want it to. Probably a lot more to talk about in this question than the previous one.

189. What was the best invention of the last 50 years?
Lots of good answers to this one. You both will probably come up with quite a few contenders. And it can be fun to debate the merits of each.

190. Does technology simplify life or make it more complicated?
This one sometimes leads to an interesting conversation about tech and modern life, but if the person lands hard on one side or the other usually there isn’t much more to talk about.

191. Will technology save the human race or destroy it?
So, this is a pretty heavy question that you don’t want to drop in casual conversation. It’s better left for conversations with people you know quite well, or folks who you know are into this type of question.

192. Which emerging technology are you most excited about?
There is a lot of promising tech fields that seem like they are just on the horizon. So which ones are you looking forward to? And perhaps which make you a little uneasy?

193. What sci-fi movie or book would you like the future to be like?
So many futures to choose from. Especially if you or the person you are talking to is a sci-fi fan. Everything from dystopian utopias to utopian dystopias.

194. What do you think the next big technological advance will be?
This is similar to the emerging technologies question, but this one isn’t about playing favorites, but about which will arrive first.

195. What technology from a science fiction movie would you most like to have?
Even if you don’t like sci-fi movies, you’ve probably craved a gadget that featured in a movie or book. This can lead to a fun spin-off conversation about gadgets.

196. What problems will technology solve in the next 5 years? What problems will it create?
Everybody likes making predictions about the future, it’s one of the human race’s defining features. And another common human behavior is fear about the future. Probably why many people are always making dire predictions that never come to pass.

197. What piece of technology would look like magic or a miracle to people in medieval Europe?
What awesome revolutionary invention would get you executed with a quickness back in the day?

198. Can you think of any technology that has only made the world worse? How about a piece of technology that has only made the world better?
Probably you both can think of quite a few from each category. And probably plenty of tech that has made the world better and worse at the same time.

Clothes / Fashion Conversation Starters
Conversation questions about clothes are always in fashion.

199. What is your favorite shirt?
Whether it’s for comfort, style, or just an exceptionally clever or funny t-shirt, everyone has a favorite.

200. Does fashion help society in any way?
This is a bit philosophical but can be a fun one to discuss. If the person seems into deeper conversations, you could give this one a go.

201. What old trend is coming back these days?
It seems that fashion always pulls from the past. Whether it’s coloring, types of clothes, or just the general style of a past decade. So, which past fashion trends are they pulling from currently?

202. What is a fashion trend you are really glad went away?
This can be the start of a fun conversation about the ridiculous fashions that have come and gone in recent decades.

203. What is the most comfortable piece of clothing you own?
It might be their favorite t-shirt, or perhaps some comfy pajamas. Either way there is bound to be something that they love relaxing in.

204. What is the most embarrassing piece of clothing you own?
This is always a fun one, we all have some embarrassing pieces of clothing lurking in our closet that we either secretly love or just haven’t gotten around to tossing out.

205. How do clothes change how the opposite sex views a person?
Another one that can lead to some deeper conversations about society or might just stay superficial. Just make sure you are in the right social situation to ask this one.

206. Do you care about fashion? What style of clothes do you usually wear?
Some people care a lot about fashion, some don’t, and some care a lot but pretend that they don’t. Which one are they?

207. If you didn’t care at all what people thought of you, what clothes would you wear?
It might be what they are currently wearing, or it might be something totally different. It all depends on how well their ideal clothing matches current trends. It’s always fun, though, if the person is into cosplay or period clothing.

208. What is the best pair of shoes you have ever owned? Why were they so good?
Comfortable shoes that look good are a rare find. You might just get some good tips on a new pair of kicks.

209. Who do you think has the biggest impact on fashion trends: actors and actresses, musicians, fashion designers, or consumers?
This sounds like a question from a fashion textbook, but it can actually often lead to some thoughtful answers and a good conversation.

Goals Conversation Starters
Let’s talk about goooooooooaaaaaaaaals!

210. What personal goals do you have?
Some people are a little cagey about their personal goals, and some are pretty open to sharing them. Just don’t make this one the first question you ask a person. Best to get to know them a bit better before popping this one.

211. What are your goals for the next two years?
Similar to the last one, but this one is a little more specific and deals with midterm goals rather than long term goals.

212. How have your goals changed over your life?
Oh, I guarantee your and their goals have changed quite a bit from 10 or 20 years ago. It’s always fun to talk about goals from the past.

213. How much do you plan for the future?
The answers to this one vary a lot from person to person. And it’s a great one to find out if they are spur of the moment or more methodical.

214. How do you plan to make the world a better place?
Some people have a solid plan, some don’t care, and some, it seems, are actively trying to make the world a worse place. Find out where on the spectrum the person you are talking lands.

215. What are some goals you have already achieved?
This one is pleasant because they get to talk about their successes. And even if they are humble, they probably still enjoy having their successes recognized.

216. What do you hope to achieve in your professional life?
Switching over from personal goals, now it’s time for a conversation about professional goals.

217. Have your parents influenced what goals you have?
For some, it might be a positive influence; for others the pressures might have pushed them in the opposite direction. Either way, this is a pretty personal question so make sure you know the person pretty well before asking them this question.

218. Do you usually achieve the goals you set? Why or why not?
Again, kind of personal, and can often lead to some bummer conversations, so be wary of this one. Make sure you know the person before asking this one.

219. What is the best way to stay motivated and complete goals?
Moving on from personal questions and kind of bummer questions, this one is looking more on the bright side of life. And you might get some good suggestions to help you achieve your own goals.

220. What are some goals you have failed to accomplish?
Whoops back into negative territory, while it can lead to a good conversation, just be cognizant of how the conversation might turn with this question.

221. What is the craziest, most outrageous thing you want to achieve?
This one is always a fun one to ask. Sometimes the person has to think a while, and sometimes they already have it lined up. But however long it takes them to answer, the answer is usually a really good one.

222. When do you want to retire? What do you want to do when you retire?
I like this question because it gets to the point of what they really want to be doing. Not what they have to be doing. You can find out a lot about a person by learning what they want to do when they aren’t obligated to be doing anything in particular.

Seasons Conversation Starters
There is a time for everything. A time to sow and a time to reap. And a time to discuss seasons!

223. Do you prefer summer or winter activities?
Fun in the sun or ummm.. furlough in the snow? There is probably a better rhyme than that, but for now, furlough will have to do. So, which is their jam, snow skiing or water skiing?

224. What do you like to do in the spring?
Whether it’s hiking or just sitting on the porch, the dawn of spring is always a pleasant time of year.

225. Did your family take seasonal vacations?
Don’t forget to follow up by asking where they would go if they answer yes to this one. Not everyone was lucky enough to be able to take vacations when they were younger, but if they were it’s always fun to hear about them.

226. Which do you prefer, fall or spring?
Both are pretty amazing, and both have some really good things going for them. But probably you and the person you are talking with have a strong preference one way or the other.

227. Which season are you most active in?
Because the seasons are so different depending on where you live, the answers to this one vary a lot from region to region. See if you and the person you are talking to agree.

228. What’s the most refreshing thing on a hot summer day?
Whether it’s a dip in the pool, a glass of fresh lemonade, an ice-cold beer, or something else entirely, it’s always fun to talk about the things that make us go “Ahhhhh.”

229. What’s the best thing to do on a cold winter day?
Indoors or out? Fun or warming? Lots of different ways you could go with this conversation starter.

230. Where is the nicest place you have been to in fall?
The leaves changing, the crisp air, there is something so invigorating about fall. I’m sure you have a favorite place, even if it is just a bench in a nice park.

231. What is your favorite thing to eat or drink in winter?
So much warm and delicious things to eat and drink in winter, it’s pretty hard to decide. Don’t feel like you have to choose just one!

232. Is it better to live where there are four seasons or where one season takes up most of the year?
I imagine this one depends on where you live. Lots of people want what they don’t have. So, my guess is that if where you live has four seasons you probably want to live somewhere with a long summer. But feel free to test out my hypothesis with this question!

Holiday Conversation Starters
Time to celebrate with some holiday conversations!

233. What is the biggest holiday for your family?
Whether holidays usually end up being a big disaster or not, there is probably at least one holiday where their family goes all out.

234. What is your favorite holiday?
Whether it’s a traditional one or a newer one, everyone has a favorite. Don’t forget to ask them why it’s their favorite, as well.

235. What holidays have been over-commercialized?
“All of them” is a totally viable answer, but this is a good steppingstone into talking about the topic in general as well as some of the newer holidays that seem to be popping up.

236. Do you wish there were more or fewer holidays? Why?
So, there are a TON of “holidays” out there. But there could always be more, or different ones, or less. Or even better yet more holidays where you can take off from work or school. Those are always fun.

237. What do you know about the history of some holidays?
The traditional holidays have some buck wild history to them. We’ve got some trivia pages on the site that go into some of the history behind a few popular holidays. You can find the links to those pages below.

238. What kinds of food do you usually eat on your favorite holiday?
It wouldn’t be a holiday without food! And every holiday tends to have its own flavors. So, find out what is traditional for them and their family and see how it compares to your traditions.

239. If you had to get rid of a holiday, which would you get rid of? Why?
There are definitely some holidays that could use a bit of pruning, rebranding, or just be outright replaced. Looking at you, Columbus Day. With this question you can find out which holidays they aren’t a fan of.

240. Does having a day off for a holiday increase or decrease productivity at work?
Sure, you might think that with a day off, productivity might decrease, but happy employees do tend to get more done. So, does it even out? Now you both can weigh in and decide together.

241. If some of the lesser-known holidays were commercialized, what would the commercialization look like?
If you can’t think of some of the lesser-known holidays, you can check out this page. So many unofficial and official holidays. So many.

242. If you could make a holiday, what would it be like? What traditions would it have? What would people eat on your holiday?
This one is really fun, especially if the person you are talking to is in any way creative. There are basically endless amounts of crazy holidays you could come up with.

Education Conversation Starters
Sharpen your pencils. It’s time for an education conversation.

243. What do you think of online education?
Whether it be online courses for schools, Khan Academy, or tutorials on YouTube there is lots of education happening online. If the person you are talking to is into education this is a rich vein for conversations.

244. What do you think of standardized tests?
Love them or hate them, they are an entrenched part of the school system. You could talk about possible improvements, how effective or ineffective they are, and if there are any viable alternatives.

245. Are bigger or smaller schools better?
Most people will agree that small class sizes are better. But how about the whole school? What are the pros and cons of a small or a big school?

246. Is teaching a skill that can be taught?
Are good teachers born, or are they created? Are there any inherent traits that might make a person more likely to be a good teacher? This one is a good pool of possible conversations to dive into.

247. What will the future of education be?
Who doesn’t love some fortune-telling? See if your idea of the future of education matches up with their prediction. What would be the best outcome? What is the most likely outcome?

248. What do you think of homeschooling?
Homeschooling is becoming more and more popular. And with anything, it has pros and cons. Whether you are for or against, it’s a great topic for those who are interested in education.

249. How can governments make education more efficient?
Because if there is one thing I’ve learned, it’s that people are totally happy with the public-school system and there is no room for improvement.

250. How has the education you received changed your life?
And if you don’t think it’s changed your life in any way, just imagine having no education, and you can see the impact of education.

251. How can technology improve education? Can it hurt education?
As with anything involved with technology, the use of technology in the classroom is hotly debated. Most want more, some want less. What kind of technology would you like to see put into the classroom, and is there any you would want to be taken out?

252. What or who has taught you most of the information you use regularly?
Is it school, friends, family, the internet? We pull information from lots of sources. Which do you think is the best source for good information?

253. What are some good and bad things about the education system in your country?
This kind of brings all the previous questions together in a big whopper of a question. Get ready for a long conversation with this question.

Food Conversation Starters
Whether they are a foodie or not, everyone has to eat, and that makes it a great topic to have a conversation about.

254. What is your favorite cuisine or type of food?
Everyone has a favorite type of food, whether it be international or local. And even if it is international cuisine, there is probably a local spin to it. This question transitions nicely into what their favorite foods are.

255. What foods do you absolutely hate?
Everyone has foods they can’t stand. And they usually like talking about why they hate them so much!

256. What do you think of buffets?
With this one, you might have to consider how the person might take it. If they are a little on the heavier side, they might think you are making a comment about their weight. Just a heads up, so you don’t offend anyone accidentally.

257. When was the last time you had a food fight?
Who doesn’t love a good food fight? Well, I guess anyone who doesn’t want food on their clothes… or anyone who doesn’t like wasting food…  but still they can be fun.

258. What food looks disgusting but tastes delicious?
There are so many foods out there that are like this. My guess is that you can think of a couple off the top of your head, and I bet whoever you are talking to can as well!

259. What do you get every time you go grocery shopping?
We all have that one snack or treat that we just can’t get enough of. And who knows you might just find your next favorite snack by asking this question.

260. If your life was a meal, what would kind of meal would it be?
Definitely a weird one. But it can be fun depending on how creative you both get with it. The fun is in the explanation of why it would be that kind of meal.

261. What would you want your last meal to be if you were on death row?
What’s the perfect meal to go out on?

262. What food do you know you shouldn’t eat but can’t stop yourself?
Don’t worry, I think we all do. And probably the person you are talking to has one as well.

263. Do you like spicy food? Why or why not? What is the spiciest thing you have ever eaten?
And have you seen some of the videos of people eating spicy food or peppers? Whew, some of those look really painful, especially when they wipe tears away, and it gets in their eyes. Ouch.

264. Does the government have a place in regulating food? To what extent should government regulate food?
This can definitely get political, so fair warning you may want to avoid this one if you don’t want to get into a conversation about politics and regulation.

265. When people make mistakes about food (especially foreign food), do you feel the need to correct them?
Some people like to know when they get something wrong, and some definitely don’t. Are you one of the people that gets annoyed when someone corrects you about food, or do you appreciate being corrected?

Weird Conversation Starters
Bring your creativity; you are going to need it.

266. If your mind were an island, what would it look like?
Whoa, dude, we are all like islands unto ourselves.

267. What flavor of ice cream do you wish existed?
So many flavor possibilities. I want spicy ice cream. I know it’s probably out there; I just haven’t run across it yet.

268. If you had a personal mascot, what would your mascot be?
Animal, ethnic stereotype, or something more abstract?

269. If you were a king/queen, what would your throne look like?
Just remember it can be any shape, size, and be made out of any combination of things.

270. Time freezes for everyone but you for one day. What do you do?
Time to find out what kind of person they really are!

271. You have to relive one day of your life forever. Which day do you choose?
Welcome to Groundhog Day, but now you get to pick. Also, there is no way out, infinite loop, but you can do whatever you want on each day.

272. What does your own personal hell look like? How about your own personal heaven?
Put your Dante hat on and get to creating!

273. You find a remote that can rewind, fast forward, stop, and start time. What do you do with it?
Yeah, I know there was a lame movie about this. But it is still a pretty cool hypothetical.

274. If you could call up anyone in the world and have a one-hour conversation, who would you call?
You could learn something from them by asking questions, you could try to convince them to do something or not do something, or you could just try to befriend them.

275. The world has become infested with rabid dogs with the intelligence of a 5-year-old, where do you hole up to survive the “a-pup-calypse”?
I’m not sure if this has been made into a really cheesy horror film, but if it hasn’t, it should be.

276. A portal to another world opens in front of you. You don’t know how long it will stay open or if you’ll be able to get back after you go through. What do you do?
You don’t know if what’s on the other side is bad or good, but you’ll need to make a choice relatively quickly.

Even more questions
Sure 276 questions is a lot, but how about more than 1,000 extra questions!

500 Good questions to ask
200 Icebreaker questions
200 Questions to get to know someone
200 Questions to ask a guy
200 Questions to ask a girl
Search for:
Enter search keywords
QUESTIONS
Home
500 Good questions to ask
250 Conversation Starters
Would you rather questions
200 Questions to get to know someone
Questions to ask a guy
Questions to ask a girl
202 Philosophical questions
Questions to ask your crush
Questions to ask your boyfriend
Questions to ask your girlfriend
Questions to ask over text
This or That Questions
21 Questions Game
Fun questions to ask
Funny questions to ask
Deep Conversation Topics
Topics to talk about
Most Likely to Questions
200 Questions to ask your friends
Privacy Policy

About Conversation Starters World

Contact Page

Choose a language
English
Copyright © 2026 Conversation Starters World

Skip to content

Search
Search
Search...
conversation topics featured image
250+ Fun conversation topics
Articles, Lists and Ideas
Conversation topics
If you are looking for something to talk about or a specific discussion subject, then you are in the right place! Here are hundreds of conversation topics with thousands of questions on all manner of things. You are pretty much guaranteed to find a theme of discourse that you like.

Originally these conversation topics and their questions were designed for English learning activities but they have since evolved to become a comprehensive list that can be used by all English speakers. They can be used amongst friends, family, work colleagues, dating partners, and anybody who just wants something to chinwag about.

By clicking on one of the desired topics below you will be brought to a related page that has questions on the subject. Each page also has a free printable PDF of conversation questions along with some ideas to supplement the discussion with things like idioms.

This list and its contents have taken several years to assemble and is ever expanding. It is hoped that you will find the themed questions both useful and engaging in your quest for meaningful communication!

The discussion topics have been arranged in alphabetical order to make it easy and straightforward to find what you are looking for. The list of topics has also been broken down into 3 separate sections to make it even easier to navigate.

Conversation Topics A - E
Accidents

Adventure

Advertising

Advice

Africa

Age

Airports

Anger

Animals

Appearance

Appliances

Art

Artificial Intelligence

Asia

Australia

Banks

Barbecues

Beach

Beauty

Bees

Birds

Birthdays

Body language

Books and reading

Boredom

Brain

Bread

Breakfast

Bucket list

Business

Camping

Cars

Cats

Change

Charity

Childhood

Chocolate

Chores

Christmas

Cinema

Cities

Citizenship

Clothing

Coffee

Cold

Colors

Comfort

Communication

Comparatives

Complaints

Computers

Construction and building

Consumerism

Cooking

Corn

Countries

COVID

Crime

Culture

Daily Routines

Danger

Dating

Decisions and choices

Dentists

Desert Island

Dessert

Diving

DIY

Dogs

Dreams

Drinks

Driving

Drought

Easter

Electricity

Elephants

England

Entertainment

Environment

Exercise

Extinction

Extreme sports

Conversation Topics F - N
Fall and Autumn

Fame

Family

Farming

Fashion

Fast Food

Favorites

Fears

Feelings

Fire

First conditional

Fish

Fishing

Flowers

Flying

Football

Freedom

Friendship

Fruit

Furniture

Future

Gadgets

Gambling

Gardening

Ghosts

Gifts

Global warming

Goals

Going to

Gold

Habits

Halloween

Hair

Happiness

Health and sickness

Healthy living

Heat

Hiking

History

Hobbies

Holidays

Home

Hometowns

Honesty and lies

Hope

Horses

Hotels

Housing

How much how many

Hunting

Insects

Internet

Inventions

Jail

Japan

Jobs

Jungles

Kindness

Kitchens

Languages

Law

Laziness

Logging

Loneliness

Loss

Love

Luck

Lunch

Manners

Marriage

Meat

Medicine

Memory

Migration

Milk

Mining

Money

Moon

Morning

Mosquitos

Motivation

Motorcycles

Mountains

Moving

Music

Natural disasters

Natural wonders

Nature

Neighbors

News

New Year

Noise

Nuclear energy

Numbers

Nutrition

Conversation Topics O - Z
Ocean

Obesity

Oil

Past continuous

Past perfect

Past simple

Patience

People

Personality

Pets

Philosophy

Phones

Photography

Phrasal verbs

Picnics

Pirates

Pizza

Police

Pollution

Poverty

Predictions

Present perfect

Privacy

Rain

Recycling

Reptiles

Restaurants

Rice

Rivers

Roads

Robots

Safety

Salt

Sailing

Saving

School

Science

Seafood

Secrets

Senses

Sharks

Shopping

Siblings

Sleep

Smoking

Snow

Social Media

South America

Space

Spices

Sports

Spring

Storms

Stress

Study

Success

Sugar

Summer

Superlatives

Superstition

Swimming

Tattoos

Tea

Television

Thanksgiving

Thought provoking

Tigers

Time

Tourism

Trade

Trains

Transport

Trash

Travel

Trees

Trust

UFOs

Unemployment

USA

Vegetables

Video games

Volcanoes

Walking

War

Water

Waterfalls

Water Sports

Wealth

Weather

Weekends

Whales

WH questions for kids

Winter

Wind

Wisdom

Work

Would you rather

Zero conditional

Zoos

people discussing conversation topics
Notes on using the conversation topics
The sheer volume of discussion topics and related questions here means that you can find something that the person or people that you are talking to feel interested in and passionate about. This in itself gives you a head start in having a rich and enjoyable conversation.

Try to approach your chosen subject with some freedom. Not all the questions provided need to be asked, or debated. You should also try to add some more questions of your own and even put a twist on those provided to make them more appropriate for your audience.

The questions are not intended to be met with Yes/No responses or short simple answers. Try to ask follow-up questions and inquire more about the replies you are given to stimulate more discourse. The more language you exchange while you are speaking, the more successful and beneficial your conversation will be.

You might also like these
alternate animal names game 1
40 funny alternate animal names game
free printable letter tiles
96 Free printable letter tiles (PDF)
things that are cold featured image
100+ Things that are cold
← Previous Post
Next Post →
Categories
Art and Craft Activities
Articles, Lists and Ideas
Coloring Pages
ESL Conversation Questions
ESL Pair Work Activities
ESL Puzzles
Flashcards
Idioms and Expressions
Kids worksheets
Pronunciation
Vocabulary Worksheets
Writing Worksheets
Free ESL  and English teaching resources, no sign up required. Just find what you like, download it and head to class!

Contact
Disclaimer
Privacy Policy
© 2026 ESL Vault
About ESL Vault
Terms of use
Share ESL Vault with your friends!

Categories
Writing Worksheets
Vocabulary Worksheets
Pronunciation
Kids worksheets
Idioms and Expressions
Flashcards
ESL Puzzles
ESL Pair Work Activities
ESL Conversation Questions
Coloring Pages
Articles, Lists and Ideas
Art and Craft Activities
conversation starters home

Deep Conversation Questions

What are Deep Questions?
Deep conversation questions are powerful tools for building genuine connections and fostering meaningful interactions. A deep question is one that invites people to share their core values, experiences, and what truly matters to them. These questions go beyond surface-level topics and encourage introspection and thoughtful responses.

Small Talk vs. Deep Talk
While small talk serves as a social lubricant, deep talk allows for more profound connections. Small talk typically involves brief, superficial exchanges about topics like weather or recent events. In contrast, deep talk delves into personal experiences, beliefs, and emotions. The key difference lies in the level of vulnerability and authenticity required.

Characteristics of Deep Questions
Deep questions are:
Open-ended, encouraging elaborate responses
Thought-provoking, stimulating reflection
Personal, touching on individual experiences and perspectives

How to Ask Deep Questions
Be genuinely curious: Set an intention to be more curious about the other person.
Start with open-ended questions: Rephrase simple questions to make them more thought-provoking.
Follow up: Ask follow-up questions to dig deeper into the topic.
Listen actively: Pay attention to the responses and use them to guide further questions.
Create a comfortable environment: Ensure the setting and timing are appropriate for deeper conversations.

Below are examples of deep conversation questions with follow up questions that you can incorporate into your interactions, you can foster more meaningful connections and gain a deeper understanding of others. Remember, the key is to approach these conversations with genuine interest and respect for the other person's thoughts and experiences.

Childhood and Growth
What was your greatest fear as a kid?
Do you remember a specific moment when you felt that fear the most?
How did you overcome that fear or do you still have that fear?
Do you think your childhood fears influenced who you are today?
What do you miss most about childhood?
Do you think life was better back then?
Who from your childhood do you miss the most?
What's something from your childhood that you didn't appreciate at the time but do now?
What was your favorite age?
What made that age so special for you?
Do you think your younger self at that age would be proud of who you are today?
If you could relive that time, would you do anything differently?
How have you changed over the past decade?
Are there any beliefs or values you held 10 years ago that have shifted?
How have your priorities changed over time?
What's something you used to worry about that no longer seems important?


Personal Reflection and Self-Improvement
What qualities do you cherish most in a friendship?
How do you maintain strong friendships despite busy schedules and life changes?
Can you share a time when a friend showed you those qualities in a meaningful way?
What's something a friend has done for you that you'll never forget?
What do you consider your strongest character trait?
Have you always had this trait, or did you develop it over time?
How has this trait helped you in different areas of your life?
What's another trait you admire in others that you'd like to develop more?
If you could improve one aspect of your character, what would it be?
What made you choose this particular trait to work on?
How do you think improving this aspect would impact your life?
What challenges have you faced in trying to improve this part of yourself?
How have your personal values evolved over the past decade?
What life experiences influenced the biggest changes in your values?
Have any of your core values remained unchanged?
How have your values impacted major life decisions, like career choices or relationships?
What inspires you to grow and improve?
Can you recall a specific moment when you felt truly inspired to improved?
How do you measure your progress when working toward self-improvement?
How do you stay motivated when progress feels slow or difficult?
When were you most disappointed in yourself?
What did you learn from the experience?
Have you had a chance to make up for it or do things differently since then?
If you could go back in time and redo the situation, what would you have done differently?
What's the best advice you've received?
Who gave you this advice, and what was the context?
What's a situation where this advice helped you the most?
Have you shared this advice with others?
What do you most value in a partner?
Why is that so important to you?
Have your values in a partner changed over time?
Do you think your past relationships have influenced what you value now?
What's your worst habit?
Have you ever tried to break it? If so, how?
How does this habit affect your daily life?
If you could replace this habit with a better one, what would it be?
How do you deal with conflict?
What's the biggest challenge you face when dealing with conflict?
Has your approach to conflict changed over time?
Is there a specific strategy or mindset that helps you navigate difficult situations?
What are your biggest 3 priorities right now?
Why are these your top three priorities?
Which of these is the most important?
How do these priorities align with your long-term goals?
What motivates you in your life?
Has your motivation changed over time? If so, how?
Can you share a specific moment when you felt truly motivated?
What happens when you lose motivation? How do you regain it?
In what ways do you feel like you're unique?
What experiences or background factors do you think contribute to your uniqueness?
Do you think your uniqueness gives you an advantage in certain situations? How?
Are there any challenges that come with being unique?
What advice would you give to your younger self?
At what age do you think this advice would have been most valuable to you?
What experiences led you to this advice?
How would your life be different now if you had followed this advice earlier?
What do you think about most?
Do you find these thoughts energizing or overwhelming?
Are these thoughts mostly about the past, present, or future?
Do you actively try to change or control your thoughts, or do you let them flow naturally?

Family and Friends
What do you admire most about your parents?
How have their qualities influenced your own life or values?
What is one challenge they faced that showed their strength or character?
Can you share a specific moment that made you admire them even more?
Are you close to your family?
Is there a particular family member you feel especially connected to? Why?
How do you usually stay in touch with your family?
What's one thing you appreciate most about your family dynamic?
How would you describe your relationship with your parents?
Has your relationship with your parents changed over time? If so, how?
Do you feel like they understand you well? Why or why not?
Are there any challenges or struggles you've faced in your relationship with them?
How do your parents show their love and support for you?
What is the most memorable moment that you've had with your family?
What made that moment so special for you?
Who was there, and how did they contribute to the experience?
Is there a lesson or value you took away from that experience?
Is there someone in your family you find challenging to get along with?
What is it about your relationship with them that makes it challenging?
Are there specific situations that tend to cause tension?
Have you found any strategies that help you manage the relationship?
What is your happiest childhood memory?
Who was there with you?
What specific details stand out the most?
If you could relive that moment, would you change anything about it?
What is your most difficult childhood memory?
Did you have anyone to support you during that time?
How did you cope with it then, and how do you view it now?
Do you think that experience changed you in any way?
When did you first tell someone outside of your family, "I love you"?
How did you feel before saying it? Nervous? Excited? Confident?
How did they react?
Do you think you fully understood what "I love you" meant at the time?
What do you cherish most in a friendship?
What's a moment with a friend that made you feel truly valued?
How do you usually show appreciation for your friends?
Do you believe friendships should be effortless, or do they require work?
What role do you typically play within your friend group?
Do you enjoy the role you play, or do you sometimes wish it were different?
What do you think your role says about your personality?
What roles do others play in your friend group?
How would your family or friends describe you?
Would different people in your life describe you in different ways? Why?
Are there any qualities you hope people see in you but aren't sure they do?
Have you ever been surprised by how someone described you?

Achievements and Life Events
What achievement are you most proud of, and why is it so meaningful to you?
What challenges did you face while achieving this, and how did you overcome them?
What emotions did you feel when you accomplished this, and why?
Did anyone help or inspire you along the way?
What mistake did you learn the most from?
Can you walk me through what happened and what led to the mistake?
What was your initial reaction, and how did you handle the situation at the time?
What specific lesson did you take away from this experience?
What was the best birthday you've ever had?
What made this birthday so special for you?
Who was there to celebrate with you, and how did they contribute to the experience?
Was there a particular moment that stood out the most?
What was the best thing to happen to you in the past year?
What made that moment so special for you?
What did you learn from that experience?
Was there anyone else involved who made it particularly meaningful?
What was your biggest failure? What did you learn from it?
Do you think this failure changed how you approach things now?
Was there anyone who helped you through it?
If you could redo it, would you change anything?
What was the worst thing to happen to you in the past year?
Was there anything or anyone that helped make it a little easier?
Do you feel like you've found any peace with it?
Were there any positive outcomes or silver linings from the situation?
What's the best decision you've ever made?
Do you think it was good planning, fate, luck, or just good instincts?
What were some of the risks involved, and how did you manage them?
Were there any surprises or unexpected outcomes from that decision?
What event has had the greatest impact on your life?
How did this event change your perspective on life?
What were the immediate and long-term consequences of this event?
How did you cope with or adapt to the changes brought by this event?
What was the biggest sacrifice you made?
Was it worth making the sacrifice?
What led you to decide to make this sacrifice?
What did you learn about yourself through this experience?



Values and Ethics
In what situations, if any, do you think breaking the law is justified?
Do you think there's a difference between breaking laws that are unjust versus those that are generally considered fair?
How do you think society would function if everyone felt free to break laws they personally disagreed with?
Do you think there are non-violent ways to address unjust laws that are preferable to breaking them?
How do you determine if something is right or wrong?
To what extent do you think cultural background influences one's sense of right and wrong?
How do you approach ethical dilemmas where there's no clear right or wrong answer?
Do you believe there are universal moral truths, or is morality relative?
Is it ever okay to lie?
How do you define a "white lie," and do you believe such lies are ethically different from other types of deception?
What role does intent play in determining the morality of a lie?
In your opinion, does lying to protect someone's feelings cause more harm or good in the long run?
Is freedom or security more important?
Are there areas of life where you believe security should always take precedence over freedom, or vice versa?
Do you think it's possible to increase both freedom and security simultaneously? If so, how?
In your opinion, what are the potential long-term consequences of prioritizing security over freedom, or vice versa?
Are all people's lives equally valuable?
What role does the quality of life play in determining the value of a person's life?
What ethical considerations arise when comparing the value of a child's life to that of an elderly person?
In what ways might valuing all lives equally conflict with real-world decision-making, such as in healthcare resource allocation?
What do you consider your most important core values?
How did you initially identify these core values? Was it through self-reflection, life experiences, or external influences?
Can you provide specific examples of how your core values have guided important decisions in your life?
In what ways do your core values influence your daily habits and routines?
Is it possible to have good without bad?
How might our understanding of good and bad change if we lived in a world without one or the other?
In what ways does cultural context influence our perception of what is good or bad?
Can you think of any real-world scenarios where the line between good and bad becomes blurred or ambiguous?

Happiness and Success
What brings you the most joy?
What do you think is the key element that makes this activity or experience so joyful for you?
Has your source of joy changed over time, or has it remained consistent?
What role does this source of joy play in helping you cope with challenges or stress?
How do you define success?
How do you handle setbacks or failures in pursuit of your definition of success?
What personal qualities or values do you believe are essential for achieving success?
What are some common misconceptions about success that you think people often overlook?
Is happiness the most important goal in life?
How do you define happiness?
Do you think happiness is a long-term goal or something we experience in moments?
Do you think happiness is within our control, or is it influenced by external factors?
Do you think you'd be happier with more money?
What would do differently if you had more money?
Do you think there's a point where having more money could potentially decrease happiness?
Are there any non-monetary things that you feel would bring you more happiness than having more money?
What does an ideal life look like for you?
What specific steps are you taking now to move closer to that ideal life?
What are the key elements that make it ideal for you?
What does work or purpose look like in your ideal life?

Challenges and Resilience
What makes you feel anxious?
How do you typically manage or cope with these feelings of anxiety?
Are there specific environments or people that help ease your anxiety?
Has your anxiety changed over time, or has it always felt the same?
How do you manage stressful situations?
Can you share a specific example of a stressful situation you faced and how you handled it?
What strategies do you use to stay calm under pressure?
Do you think stress can be beneficial? How does it affect your decision-making?
When was the last time you felt like a failure?
How do you define failure for yourself?
Looking back, do you still see it as a failure, or has your perspective changed?
What would you do differently if faced with a similar situation today?
What was the most challenging period in your life?
What made that period so challenging for you?
What steps did you take to address or overcome the situation?
What was the biggest lesson you took away from that experience?
What do you worry about the most?
Why does this particular worry stand out to you?
How does this worry affect your daily life or work performance?
What steps do you take to address or mitigate your worries?
What scares you most about the future?
Have you always felt this way, or did something specific make you worry about it?
How do you think people in the past felt about the future? Were their fears justified?
How do you personally prepare for an uncertain future?
When was the last time you cried? Why?
How did you feel after crying? Did it help you process your emotions?
Do you usually cry easily, or was this an unusual moment for you?
How do you typically cope with strong emotions besides crying?
What is your greatest fear right now?
What's the worst-case scenario, and how likely do you think it is?
Is there anything that helps ease this fear for you?
Has facing fears in the past helped you grow or become stronger?

Life Goals and Aspirations
What is your biggest goal in life?
What steps are you currently taking to achieve this goal?
Are there any specific challenges or obstacles you anticipate facing, and how do you plan to overcome them?
Why is this goal so important to you?
What do you want your legacy to be?
What specific actions or accomplishments do you think will help you achieve this legacy?
Are there any challenges or obstacles you anticipate facing as you work towards creating this legacy?
Who in your life has left a lasting legacy that inspires you?
What impact do you want to make on this world?
Why is this impact important to you?
What challenges do you anticipate in achieving this impact?
How will you measure whether you’ve made a difference?
What are some of your short-term goals?
Why are these goals important to you right now?
What challenges do you anticipate in reaching these goals?
How do these short-term goals align with your long-term vision?
What topics are you most interested in learning more about?
What sparked your interest in these topics?
How do you think learning about these topics will benefit you personally or professionally?
What resources or tools do you think would be most helpful in learning about these topics?
What would you like to get better at?
Why is this skill or ability important to you?
What steps have you already taken to improve in this area?
How will improving in this area impact other aspects of your life?
What is on your bucket list?
Which item on your bucket list are you most excited about? Why?
Have you already crossed anything off your list? If so, how was the experience?
Are there any bucket list goals you’re actively working on right now?
What is something you wished you had more time to spend on?
What is it about this activity that makes it so important or enjoyable to you?
What’s preventing you from spending more time on it now? How can you make more time for it?
How do you feel when you do get time to focus on it?



Philosophical and Existential
What do you believe is the purpose of life?
Are there any specific experiences or influences that have shaped your belief about life's purpose?
How does your belief about life's purpose impact your daily decisions and actions?
Do you think everyone has the same purpose, or is it unique to each person?
What do you think happens after we die?
What has shaped your beliefs about the afterlife (or lack of one)?
How do your beliefs about what happens after death impact how you live your life now?
Do you find comfort or fear in your perspective on what happens after death? Why?
Would you want to know the exact date of your death if given the choice?
Why or why not? What factors influence your decision?
How do you think knowing would change the way you live your life?
Would you tell others about it, or keep it to yourself?
How and when would you like to die?
Why do you feel this is the ideal way to go?
Would you rather die suddenly or have time to prepare? Why?
How do you balance the desire for longevity with quality of life considerations?
Do you believe in God? Why?
What experiences or reasoning have most shaped your current perspective on God?
How does your view on God impact your daily life and decision-making?
Do you think faith and science can coexist, or are they in conflict?
Do you believe in fate?
Do you think we have control over our destiny, or is everything predetermined?
How do you reconcile the idea of fate with the concept of free will?
How does your belief in fate (or lack of it) affect the way you make decisions?

Misc
What do you do for work? How did you get into that line of work?
What do you enjoy most about your work?
What are some of the biggest challenges you face in your current role?
How do you see your career evolving in the future? Are there any specific goals or aspirations you have?
What are your hobbies, and how did you get into them?
What do you enjoy most about your hobbies?
Are there any hobbies you used to enjoy but no longer pursue? Why did you stop?
How often do you spend time on your hobbies?
How do you typically handle criticism?
Can you give an example of a time when you received criticism and how you responded to it?
What strategies do you use to stay open-minded when receiving feedback?
How do you balance confidence in yourself with being receptive to feedback?
Are you a giver, taker, or matcher?
Have you always been this way, or has your approach evolved over time?
Do you think one of these styles leads to more success or happiness in life? Why?
What experiences have shaped the way you give or take in relationships?
What is the best thing about being you?
Have you always recognized this as a strength, or did it take time to appreciate?
Is this something you actively try to nurture and develop further?
Can you give an example of a time when this trait or quality really shone through?
If you could live someone else's life for a day, who would you choose?
What specifically about their life intrigues you the most?
What do you hope to learn or gain from experiencing life as this person for a day?
Do you think there are any challenges or difficulties in this person's life that you might not be prepared for?
What's a common misconception people have about you?
Why do you think people have that misconception?
How do you usually respond when someone assumes that about you?
Are there any strategies you use to ensure that people get to know the real you beyond this misconception?


More from Conversation Starters.com:

Open Ended Questions
Open Ended Questions
Random Conversation Question Generator
Random Conversation Question Generator
101 Conversation Starters
101 Conversation Starters
Free Printable Conversation Cards
Free Printable Conversation Cards
How to Start a Conversation
How to Start a Conversation




Copyright © 2009-2026 Conversation Starters.com
Privacy Policy

conversation starters home

101 Great Conversation Starters

Here is a collection of 101 conversation starters that you can use to help you connect with others (friends, couples, someone new...). Ideally these questions will spark further discussions that lead to deeper connections; we've included potential follow up questions that you can ask to help keep the conversation flowing. We have a variety of great questions in different topics ranging from interesting and fun to clever and witty. If you need more help starting a conversation, visit How to Start a Conversation

Printable PDF
Ice Breakers
Where did you grow up?
What did you like most about where you grew up?
What did you like least about where you grew up?
Do you have any pets?
How long have you had your pet for?
What's your pet's name?
Why did you name him/her that?
Do you have any siblings?
How did you like being a single child?
What was it like being the [youngest/middle/oldest] child?
Do you know what your name means?
Do you know why your parents gave you that name?
If you had to change your name, what would you change it to?
What type of phone do you have?
How old is your phone?
How often do you get a new phone?


What did you do this past weekend?
What did you enjoy most about that?
Did you go with anyone else?
Is that a typical weekend for you?
What are your plans for this weekend?
That sounds fun! What specific activities do you have planned?
How did you come up with that idea for the weekend?
What do you like to do in your spare time?
How did you get started with that hobby/activity?
Are you a part of any clubs/groups?
What is the first thing you do when you wake up?
Why do you choose to do that first?
Is this part of a bigger morning routine?
Do you do this first on both weekdays and weekends?
What is the last thing you do before you go to sleep?
Why do you choose to do that last?
Is this part of a bigger night time routine that you have?
Do you do this last thing on both weekdays and weekends?
What is your middle name?
Do you know why your parents gave you that name?
Do you know what your middle name means?
What was the last thing you purchased?
Where did you buy it from?
How did you decide to purchase that item?
What is your favorite holiday?
Why is it your favorite?
Do you have any traditions you do on that holiday?
What is your favorite day of the week?
What makes it your favorite day?
What is your least favorite day?
If you could meet anyone in history, who would it be?
Why did you choose that person?
What questions would you ask them?
What do you like to do to relax?
How often do you get to do that?
Do you have a favorite place or setting where you like to relax?
Why do you enjoy that activity?
Are you a saver or a spender?
How do you think your upbringing influenced your views on money?
What short and long term financial goals do you have?
How do you manage your budget?
Do you play any instruments?
How long have you been playing for?
How did you start playing [instrument]?

conversation starters
Childhood Questions
What was your favorite children's book?
What makes this book your favorite?
What was this book about?
What was your favorite part of this book?
What is your earliest childhood memory?
How old were you at the time?
Who else was there during this memory?
Why do you think this memory stands out to you?
What type of kid were you (e.g. spoiled, rebellious, well-behaved, quiet, obnoxious...)?
Have you changed since you were a kid?
Are there any traits from your childhood that you still see in yourself today?
What is one thing you miss about being a kid?
What is your favorite memory associated with that?
What is one thing that you do not miss about being a kid?
What did you want to grow up to be when you were younger?
What is your dream job now?
Why did you not pursue the job you wanted to do when you were younger?

School/Work Topics
Where did (do) you go to school?
How did you like school?
What was your favorite part about school?
What was your least favorite part about school?
What was (is) your favorite subject?
Why was it your favorite subject?
Did a teacher influence you to like this subject?
What was (is) your least favorite subject?
Why was it your least favorite subject?
Did a teacher influence you to not like this subject?
What's the first thing you do after school/work?
If you could change one thing about your after-school/work routine, what would it be?
Were you the class clown or teacher's pet?
If you could go back, would you choose to be the same role again or try to change?
What do you do for a living?
How did you get into that line of work?
What does a routine day at work look like for you?
What is your dream job?
What inspired you to choose that as your dream job?
Are you taking any steps to achieve your dream job?
If you had $10 million, would you still be working/going to school?
What would you do if you weren't in school/working?
How would your life change if you had that much money?
What would you do with your new found wealth?
What was your least favorite job that you've ever had?
What made the job so unlikable?
What did you learn from that job?
What would you have changed about that job if you could?
What is something that you have gotten in trouble for at school/work?
How did you handle the situation?
If you could go back, would you do anything differently?
Was there anything positive that came from that incident?

Relationship Questions
What is the first thing you notice about a guy or girl?
How important is physical appearance compared to personality traits in making a first impression?
Do you think first impressions are deceptive?
Have you ever been in love?
How do you know it was love?
How would you define love?
Do you believe in soulmates?
Is it possible to have more than one soulmate?
Do you think we meet our soulmate by fate or do we need to proactively look for him/her?
What are your turn offs?
Are there any turn offs that you've changed your mind about over time?
Do you believe in love at first sight?
How important is initial attraction in a romantic relationship?
Have you ever fallen in love with somebody by what you saw?
Do you prefer short hair or long hair on a [guy/girl]?
What do you find most appealing about [short/long] hair?
If someone were to change their hairstyle, would that affect your perception of them?
What do you look for in a guy/girl?
What qualities do you value most in a partner?
What makes you feel loved and appreciated in a relationship?
Who was the last person you called?
How often do you call this person?
What was the reason for the call?
Do you prefer calling or texting?
Would you rather be rich and never find true love or be poor and find true love?
What is the biggest sacrifice you'd make to find true love?
Do you believe that money can buy happiness?

Sports Conversation Starters
Who is your favorite athlete?
Why is he/she your favorite athlete?
When did he/she become your favorite athlete?
How often do you exercise?
What exercises do you do?
Do you exercise at a gym?
What is your favorite sports team?
How long have you been a fan of the team?
How did they become your favorite team?
Do you play any sports?
How did you get into that sport?
How often do you play?
Who do you play with?

Vacation Questions
Where was the last place you went on vacation?
What did you do there?
Would you go back again?
Where do you plan on going for your next vacation?
How long do you plan on going for?
What do you plan on doing there?
If you could live anywhere in the world, where would it be?
What specifically draws you to that place?
What kind of lifestyle do you envision living there?
What challenges do you foresee if you were to live there?
What countries have you traveled to?
Are there any new countries that you would like to visit that you have been to before?
Which country was your favorite?
What was your worst vacation experience?
What specific events made it the worst experience?
If you could go back in time, would you do anything different?

Food/Drink Topics
What is your favorite drink?
Is there a specific brand or type you prefer?
What do you like to pair with that drink?
What is your favorite food?
Is there a specific recipe or restaurant that you prefer?
Did you grow up eating this or did you discover it later in life?
What is your favorite meal of the day?
What do you usually eat for that meal?
Do you prefer to eat at home or at a restaurant?
Are there any foods that you dislike or will not eat?
Why do you dislike this food? Is it the texture, flavor, or a bad experience with it?
Have you ever tried to like it or give it another chance?
Are there any foods that you would like to try?
Why haven't you tried it yet?
Where did you learn about this food?
What is your favorite restaurant?
Is there a specific dish that you like there?
How often do you go?

What is your favorite pizza topping?
What is the weirdest pizza topping combination that you've had?
What's your least favorite pizza topping?
What is your favorite ice cream flavor?
Do you like to put anything on top of your ice cream?
Is there any ice cream flavor you don't like?
Do you prefer ice cream in a bowl or cone?
What did you have for dinner last night?
How was it?
Did you eat alone or with other people?
Where did you have dinner? At home, a restaurant, or somewhere else?
What is the signature dish that you cook?
How often do you cook that dish?
How did you learn to cook?
Do you cook a lot?

Entertainment Topics
Who is your favorite [actor/actress]?
What is your favorite movie that they were in?
Have you seen them in any recent films or shows?
What is your favorite movie of all time?
How many times have you watched it?
What makes that movie your favorite?
What was the worst movie you've ever seen?
Did you watch the whole thing?
What made you decide to watch it?
What is your favorite TV show?
What is it about?
Who is your favorite character in it?
Have you watched it more than once?
What was the last movie you've seen?
What did you think of it?
Are there any upcoming movies you're looking forward to seeing?
Was there a particular reason you chose to watch that movie?
What type of music do you like to listen to?
What’s your favorite artist or band?
Do you have a favorite song or album?
Who is your favorite music artist?
Have you ever been to their concert?
What's your favorite song by them?
When was the first time you heard them?
What was the last book you read?
What did you think of the book?
Why did you choose to read that book?
What was the book about?

Personal Questions
Who do you look up to?
What qualities or traits do you admire most about this person?
Have they influenced your life in any specific ways?
Where do you see yourself 5 years from now?
Do you think your vision might change over time? If so, how?
What do you need to do to get to where you see yourself?
What are you scared of?
What do you think is the root cause of that fear?
Are you using any strategies to cope with or manage that fear?
What is the best piece of advice you've received?
Was there a particular situation where you applied this advice?
If you could give one piece of advice to your younger self, what would it be?
What do your parents do for a living?
How did your parents get into their respective fields?
Did their careers influence your own career choices or aspirations?
What is your biggest regret?
If you could go back in time, what would you do differently?
What is your most embarrassing moment?
If you could go back in time, would you change anything about that moment, or would you leave it as is?
What did you learn from that experience?
What is the craziest thing you've ever done?
What motivated you to do that crazy thing?
Looking back, would you do it again?
What’s the craziest thing you’ve seen someone else do?
What are some of your short-term goals?
What inspired you to set these particular goals?
How do these short-term goals align with your long-term aspirations?
What are some of your long-term goals?
Have your long-term goals changed over time? If so, how?
What challenges do you anticipate facing as you work toward these goals?
What will success look like for you in relation to these goals?

Fun Starters
Do you sleep with a stuffed animal?
What kind of stuffed animal do you sleep with and how long have you had it for?
Is there a special story behind how you got your stuffed animal?
Does having your stuffed animal next to you help you sleep better?
Tell me about your first car.
How did you feel when you first got it?
What was your most memorable experience with the car?
Do you drink coffee or tea?
What type of [tea/coffee] do you drink?
Do you put anything in your drink?
How many cups do you drink?
If you could have any super power, what would it be?
How would you use your super power?
How would your new super powers change your relationships?
Would you keep it a secret or share it with others?
If you were stranded on a deserted island and you could have only 1 item, what would it be?
Why did you choose that particular item?
If you could bring one additional person with you, who would it be and why?
What would your plan be to survive?
Do you believe in luck?
Do you think luck plays a significant role in success, or is it more about hard work?
What was the luckiest thing that happened to you?
Do you play video games?
What's your favorite game?
How often do you play?
Do you believe people are inherently good?
How do you define good?
Can people who are good do bad things?
How often do you shower?
Do you shower in the morning or at night?
What is your favorite board game?
Who do you like to play it with?
When was the first time you played it?
What is your favorite charity?
Tell me more about the charity.
What makes this charity your favorite?
Have you ever gotten a speeding ticket?
How fast were you going?
What was the fine?
Do you prefer cats or dogs?
Why do you like them more?
What do you think are the biggest differences between cats and dogs as pets?
Would you prefer to live in the city or a rural area?
Why do you prefer that?
What is your favorite season?
What's your favorite activity to do during this season?
What's your least favorite season?
Do you speak any other languages?
How did you learn that language?
How fluent are you in that language?
Are there any other languages you’d like to learn in the future?
Have you ever cried because you were so happy?
What was the occasion that made you so happy?
How do you normally express your happiness?
What is the best thing that happened to you during the past week?
Did you learn or gain anything from that "best thing"?
What is the worst thing that happened to you during the past week?
How did you cope with that situation?
Do you sing in the shower?
What song do you like to sing?
Do you listen to anything while showering?
What is the most valuable thing that you own?
Why is it so valuable to you?
How did you get it?
Do you have any special memories associated with this item?
What would you do if you only had 24 hours left to live?
What would your last meal be?
Who would you want to spend your last hours with?

100 More Conversation Questions ►




More from Conversation Starters.com:

Random Conversation Question Generator
Random Conversation Question Generator
Random Would You Rather Question Generator
Random Would You Rather Question Generator
Good Would You Rather Questions
Good Would You Rather Questions
Conversation Questions by Topic
Conversation Questions by Topic




Copyright © 2009-2026 Conversation Starters.com
Privacy Policy